Authors
Michael Elliott
Number of Reviews
32

Title
Review for Lola rennt (1998)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Tom Tykwer
STARRING:         Franka Potente, Moritz Bleibtreu, Herbert Knaup, Nina
Petri
WRITTEN BY:       Tom Tykwer
RATED:            R for sex, violence, and profanity
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       2 Thessalonians 1:11, 1 Thessalonians 1:7, Titus 2:6-8
What we have here is a simple matter of style over substance. RUN LOLA
RUN, a 1998 German film which is beginning to make its way across the US,
playing in art houses and film festivals, does not have much of a story
but what it has, it tells very well.
Writer/director Tom Tykwer (WINTER SLEEPER) has taken a basic plot line,
multiplied it by three, added a techno-rock musical score and used many
inventive camera techniques to keep us riveted to the story (even though,
as I've said, there's not much of a story there.)
It all begins when Lola gets a phone call from her boyfriend, Manni.
Engaged in some shady drug deal, he finds himself owing 100,000 marks to a
man who would just as soon kill him as sneeze in his direction.  If Manni
doesn't come up with the money in 20 minutes, he's a dead man.  And with
that piece of information, Lola is off and running.
Dashing through the streets of Berlin, trying to think up a way to get
that kind of money that quickly, she rushes past people and events almost
without acknowledging their existence.
20 minutes later we see the outcome of her mad run and the results of the
decisions she made along the way.  The ending may disappoint many in the
audience but there's no need for despair.  The movie is a long way from
over.
Just like that, we're back at the phone call that began it all and once
again, Lola is off and running.  This time however, a slight delay in the
beginning results in some major differences down the road.  As we have
heard elsewhere, timing is everything.  Lola is forced to make decisions
she didn't have to make in the "first run" because she arrived at various
places a few seconds earlier or later.  Again, we play the story out to
its conclusion to find out what happens when the 20 minute deadline
expires.
Still not happy with the outcome?  Let us go back to the phone and again,
Lola will take off running.  And once again, slight changes early on in
the run have a major impact in the end result.  Clearly, the point being
made is that our lives consist of millions of such minuscule moments which
add to the overall course of our lives.  For the third time, we take the
story all the way to its ultimate conclusion.
What makes the movie work is the stylistic approach of Mr. Tykwer.  He
uses many camera tricks to heighten the enjoyment of the film.  Split
screen, stop action, slo-mo, animation mixed with live action...he
includes it all.  There is no getting bored with Mr. Tykwer at the helm of
the film.
The music by Reinhold Heil is techno rock at its best:  pounding bass,
rhythmic beat, and all.  During each run, there is no slowdown in the
action.  The urgency of the situation is pressed upon all we see.
However, in between each run are short segments with a calmer, more
intimate Lola and Manni, engaging in the silly and endearing pillow talk
of a couple obviously in love.
Franka Potente (AM I BEAUTIFUL?) is Lola, hair dyed an unnaturally red
color (which takes on the look of flames streaming off her head as she
runs full blast through the streets of Berlin.)  With a scream that could
(and does) shatter glass, Lola is truly a memorable character.
One of the themes that runs throughout the film is the impact our lives
have with others even though we may only slightly interact with them.
Whether we are aware of it or not, we leave a mark wherever we go.
Whether that mark is a good one, inspiring and encouraging to others, or a
negative one, harmful and detrimental to others, is entirely up to us and
the way we conduct our lives.
God commands us to behave ourselves worthy of His calling, as His
ambassadors on this earth.  The impression we make should remind others of
the glory and goodness of God.  Lola and Manni are not God's
representatives, nor do they present themselves as such.  But they do
illustrate how one life can affect many others.  If they leave negative
impacts, we can leave positive ones.  All it takes is an awareness and a
willingness to live for God and the fortitude to do it.

Title
Review for Dudley Do-Right (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
Brendan Fraser (GEORGE OF THE JUNGLE) continues his string of cartoon
characters by taking on the role of the world's most recognizable Canadian
Royal Mountie.  But he should have gone for the voice.  Seeing DUDLEY
DO-RIGHT without hearing the nasally pompous tones of Bill Scott (who also
did the voice of BULWINKLE) is like trying to listen to ALVIN AND THE
CHIPMUNKS' voices at regular speed.  It just isn't that funny.
With none the wit of Jay Ward's 1969 original animated source, the
filmmakers who bring us the live action DUDLEY DO-RIGHT resort to sight
gags and slapstick.  It sometimes works, it mostly doesn't.  This film's
Do-Right is more of a "doofus."
Dudley, we discover, grew up with the dream of being a Canadian Royal
Mountie.  His boyhood chum, Snidley Whiplash, had a different dream.  He
wanted to be a bad guy so he could have all the bad guy kind of fun.
Living in the Canadian town of Semi-Happy Valley, both Dudley and Snidely
attain their respective goals, opposing as they may be.  Caught in the
middle is the fair Nell Fenwick who must divide her affections betwixt
them.
After Whiplash drives off all the residents of Semi-Happy Valley, he
peppers the rocks and streams with gold buckshot in order to force a phony
"Gold Rush."  Since he now owns the entire town, the onrush of fortune
seekers is making him a fortune, turning him into a "respectable" business
man.  Why, he's even started to add color to his wardrobe.  Dudley, on the
other hand, is losing everything.  His job, his uniform, his horse...
With the spiritual help of Eric Idle (SPLITTING HEIRS), Dudley must learn
to do bad so he can get back to doing right.
The story is a disappointment to anyone who remembers the adult
intelligence and wit of Jay Ward's animated shows which combined with a
childlike innocence that made them very appealing to all ages.  However,
children will probably enjoy this new version with all its the pratfalls
and broad physical humor.  Preceding  the movie is a newly produced
animated FRACTURED FAIRY TALE that is reminiscent of Jay Ward's work.
Written by Bill Scott, it is clever enough for us to yearn for a higher
quality feature film to follow it.
Mr. Fraser has the gentle naiveté needed for the role but there's an
essential quality missing from his characterization and thus from the
movie.  The animated Dudley had a single-mindedness that bordered on the
absurd.  That element wasn't captured here which weakened the integrity of
the character.
Sarah Jessica Parker (MARS ATTACKS) isn't given much to do as Nell
Fenwick.  Hers is a romantic decision rather than a PERILS OF PAULINE
DILEMMA.  Alex Rocco (JUST WRITE) has some funny moments as the chief of a
native tribe of Indians (the Kumquat nation) who perform their cultural
dances (ALA RIVERDANCE) for the tourists.
Alfred Molina's (CELEBRITY) Snidely Whiplash does the memory of Hans
Conried, who originated the voice, proud.  Adopting a sniveling,
cartoon-evil voice and dressed in a black cape, stove pipe hat, and of
course, the trademark curled wax mustache, he looks and sounds like
Hercule Poirot's evil twin brother.  Mr. Molina is having great fun
playing the bad guy.
In fact, as Whiplash says, "Up until the end, being the bad guy is the
best job in the world."  In the end, of course, good triumphs and bad is
vanquished.  It's a bit of an unusual lesson to learn but we can see this
truth reflected all around us.  So often in life, it appears that bad men
prosper.
"Behold, these are the ungodly, who prosper in the world; they increase
in riches.  When I thought to know this, it was too painful for me;  Until
I went into the sanctuary of God; then understood I their end." Psalms
73:12, 16-17 [KJV]
Their end is not pretty.  Regardless of the appearances of prosperity
that evildoers may have attained in this world, they are left with
nothing.  In contrast, those that have lived righteous lives, believing
God to meet their needs and working heartily as unto the Lord, are
rewarded both in this lifetime and in the life that is to come.  Knowing
and believing this makes our decisions between good and evil that much
easier.

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Anthony Minghella
STARRING:         Matt Damon, Gwyneth Paltrow, Jude Law, Cate Blanchett,
Philip Seymour Hoffman, Jack Davenport
WRITTEN BY:       Anthony Minghella
RATED:            R for violence, language, and brief nudity
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       James 3:16, Job 5:2, Proverbs 14:30
It is a sin to waste one's talent.  And it is a sad pity to sit by and
watch someone else do it.  THE TALENTED MR. RIPLEY tells a sad tale of a
capable but unhappy and deeply troubled young man who desires a life other
than the one he has been given.
Matt Damon (DOGMA) plays the sociopathic pianist/bathroom attendant Tom
Ripley who is quick to confess that his primary talent is in mimicry.
Mistaken for a Princeton graduate, he is hired by a frustrated father to
fly to Italy and convince his wayward son (and fellow Princetonian)  to
return to the United States.
Recognizing a good deal when one falls in his lap, Tom readily agrees.
Even before setting foot on Italian soil, he is already introducing
himself as Dickie Greenleaf (Jude Law, EXISTENZ), the young playboy he was
sent to retrieve.  One taste of Dickie's lifestyle is enough to convince
Tom that this life is infinitely better than the one he left behind.
Little did he realize at the time the trap he was setting for himself.
After ingratiating himself to Dickie and his girlfriend Marge (Gwyneth
Paltrow, A PERFECT MURDER), Tom becomes inseparable from them.  Figuring
it is better to be "a fake somebody than a real nobody," he successfully
reinvents himself to fit in with the "manor born" crowd.  When Dickie
eventually tires of his continual company, it is no surprise to find that
Tom is not so agreeable to leave.
Upon Dickie's demise, Tom decides to adopt his identity and stay in
Italy.  This will present a bit of a problem as many already know him as
Tom Ripley and many know what Dickie Greenleaf really looks like.  Thus
begins a series of duplicitous hoops through which Tom must jump just to
keep his lies believable and his crimes undiscovered.
THE TALENTED MR. RIPLEY is more a character study than a genuine
thriller.  Mr. Damon does a fine (even if somewhat unnerving) job in
portraying a man with severe psychological problems.  Quick-witted and
even tempered, Tom's surface demeanor belies the turmoil and conflicts
raging within his heart.
Jude Law is well cast as a privileged rich child who completely and
totally disrespects the very source of his privilege.  Spoiled beyond
words, his character, Dickie, uses people as others might use old
newspaper. And yet his charismatic personality attracts people to him as
effortlessly as a light captures a moth's attention (oftentimes with the
same disastrous results).
  Both Gwyneth Paltrow and Cate Blanchett (PUSHING TIN) lend their
considerable talents to the film but play relatively insubstantial
characters, serving as pawns in the misguided Ripley's mental chess game.
Writer/director Anthony Minghella (THE ENGLISH PATIENT) working from
Patricia Highsmith's 1955 novel, has set the film in the late fifties, a
dynamic time in Italy's history.  While focusing on the novel's concept of
changing one's life by stealing the more desirable life of another, he has
made a number of textual modifications to the original tale.
An added plot device which, for me, neither enhanced nor contributed to
the appreciation of the source material was the introduction of homosexual
elements.  Subtly introduced a quarter of the way into the film, the
homosexuality of certain central characters eventually  becomes a
dominant, driving force in the film's story.  It was not needed and served
to weaken the overall impact of this psychological study.
Ripley is a tragic figure.  He is made tragic by his inability to
recognize his own self worth.  Whenever we envy the life of another, we
fail to be thankful for all we already have.  Envy leads to discontent
which opens the mind's door for all kinds of devilish thought and action.
"For where envying and strife is, there is confusion and every evil
work." James 3:16 [KJV]
When we live with the awareness that God is our sufficiency and that we
are uniquely created in Him, we are able to appreciate the lives of others
without being desirous of the lives they lead.  God would have you be
thankful for your own life.  After all... He is.

Title
Review for Thomas Crown Affair, The (1999)
DIRECTED BY:      John McTiernan
STARRING:             Pierce Brosnan, Rene Russo, Denis Leary, Faye Dunaway
WRITTEN BY:         Peter Doyle, Leslie Dixon, Kurt Wimmer
RATED:                   R for some sexuality, nudity, and language
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:    Proverbs 13:7, Revelation 3:17, Ecclesiastes 5:10
THE THOMAS CROWN AFFAIR is an attractive, stylishly-made remake of an
attractive, stylishly-made 1968 film which starred Steve McQueen and Faye
Dunaway.  Both films feature a playful but intelligent cat and mouse game
between the two leads.
In the remake, Pierce Brosnan (TOMORROW NEVER DIES) is cast as the title
character originated by Mr. McQueen.  Thomas Crown is a multi-billionaire
for whom $100,000 is merely pocket change to be squandered on an
impossible golf bet.  The high stakes of the "shark-infested" corporate
waters in which he swims has lost its challenge.  He has bested every
business opponent he has come across.  There is no more excitement in his
life.  No more heights of which to climb.  So what is a man to do?  Of
course!  Risk everything by turning to a life of crime.  He's not in it
for the money.  He just wants (needs?) the adrenaline rush.
After cleverly pulling off an art museum heist where he absconds with a
million dollar Monet, he crosses paths with Catherine Banning (Rene Russo,
TIN CUP), a smart and sexy insurance investigator who immediately senses
that Crown is her culprit.  Not being confined to police procedures, legal
niceties, or for that matter, common sense, Banning seductively confronts
Crown with the fact that she knows that he stole the painting.
As the two main characters begin to weave an intricate dance... Setting
traps, springing traps, avoiding traps... They become inexplicably drawn,
both physically and emotionally to one another.  Trust and honesty become
major stumbling blocks to them as they each consider the possibility of
entering into a romantic relationship with their opponent.
Mr. Bronsan's cool 007-like demeanor works well for this "man who has
everything."  He plays Crown as someone who has clearly become accustomed,
even bored, with the finer things of life.  That he does so without
turning in a boring performance is noteworthy.
Ms. Russo's character is a bit more enigmatic.  Banning's investigation
seems to be more intuitive than anything else, having as she does a
special prescient ability to somehow sense the truth.  By allowing herself
to get emotionally attached to Crown, her judgment begins to break down,
rendering her helpless to get a read on his true intentions.
Denis Leary (SUICIDE KINGS) does a fine job in his supporting role of
police detective Michael McCann who, from the onset, is obviously
outmatched by both Crown and Banning.  Faye Dunaway, who played the female
lead in the original film, is given a extraneous and meaningless role as
Crown's therapist.
Director John McTiernan (DIE HARD) has crafted a polished and
entertaining romantic suspense thriller.  Like the original (which won an
Academy Award for Best Song by composer Michel Legrand), the remake boasts
a wonderful score, this time by composer Bill Conti.
The biggest difference between the two versions may be most noticeable in
our modern day tolerance of more sexually explicit scenes.  "The Kiss," as
it was come to be known, between Mr. McQueen and Ms. Dunaway has been
replaced by an extended nude coupling of Mr. Bronson and Ms. Russo.
Personally, I look back fondly on the days when filmmakers could
communicate the physical desire of their characters without taking the
clothes off their performers.
Of course, it should be noted that Thomas Crown, with all his billions,
was still fundamentally empty and lost.  His money did not buy him the
peace of heart which he desired.  His life, despite his wealth, became
meaningless and dull, which is why he foolishly began breaking the law by
stealing precious artwork from museums.
Financial wealth is never the culmination of our dreams.  It is not the
answer to our prayers.  It is not the final goal of a godly man or woman.
There are riches that will satisfy but they won't be found in a bank
balance.  Spiritual riches are found in one's heart.

Title
Review for Music of the Heart (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Wes Craven
STARRING:         Meryl Streep, Aidan Quinn, Angela Bassett, Cloris
Leachman, Gloria Estefan
WRITTEN BY:       Pamela Gray
RATED:            PG for brief mild language and sensuality.
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       Proverbs 6:23, Colossians 3:23, 2 Corinthians 8:11
A study was done some time ago which measured the overall impact that
structured musical programs have on grade school children.  The results
overwhelmingly indicated that those students who studied and played a
musical instrument also performed better academically.  This finding is
not at odds with the true life story depicted in MUSIC OF THE HEART.
Meryl Streep (ONE TRUE THING) plays Roberta Guaspari, a woman whose
husband has just left her for another woman.  Taking her two young sons
and retreating to her home town and the familiar comfort of her mother
(Cloris Leachman, NEVER TOO LATE), she is at a loss as to know what she
should do next.  An old friend (Aidan Quinn, PRACTICAL MAGIC), knowing of
her skill as a violinist, points her in the direction of a teaching
position in an East Harlem alternative school.
Though she has limited work experience and virtually no professional
teaching experience, the principal (Angela Bassett, HOW STELLA GOT HER
GROOVE BACK) decides to hire her on a trial basis as a substitute teacher.
The first half of the movie has Roberta struggling through the
transitional period of coping with a very difficult time in her life...
both personally and professionally.
Ten years later, her "substitute" status remains unchanged but her violin
program has grown to encompass the students of three different inner-city
schools.  In fact, it has become so popular that the students must enter a
lottery to see who will be allowed to take her class.
The second half of this movie (which is infinitely superior to the first)
deals with Roberta's fight to save the program from succumbing to imposed
budgetary cuts.  This fight culminates with a fundraising concert named
"Fiddlefest" which was performed in 1993 on the stage at Carnegie Hall
with guest violinists Isaac Stern, Itzhak Perlman, Mark O'Connor, Arnold
Steinhardt, and others (all playing themselves).
Ms. Streep adds yet another stellar performance to an already impressive
resume.  She plays a woman supremely confident in her ability as a
musician, yet because of her failed relationships, not as confident about
herself as a woman.  We never once doubt her abilities or insecurities
even though we know both are pretended.
MUSIC OF THE HEART is directed by horror film maven Wes Craven (SCREAM),
in his first departure from the genre which brought him fame.  Mr. Craven
is not as successful in presenting the nuances of Roberta's personal life
such as the raising of her sons or her relationships with men.  But the
film soars whenever the focus returns to the music and the students who
must play it.
Over half of the students in the film were selected from Ms. Guaspari's
actual classes.  The precision, dedication, commitment and discipline
these students had to develop in order to learn this difficult instrument
will certainly be transferable to any endeavor they choose to attempt in
the future.
Ms. Guaspari's teaching secret was her innate awareness that children
desire discipline in their lives.  She elected to teach them to "stand
strong."  Not just physically, using the proper musician's stance, but
internally.  Instead of coddling them or providing them with compassionate
but unwarranted compliments, she rode them incessantly to do better.  She
inspired them to reach for greater heights.  And they loved her for it.
"For the commandment is a lamp; and the law is light; and reproofs of
instruction are the way of life:"  Proverbs 6:23 [KJV]
Without reproof to teach us when we are doing something incorrectly, we
will never learn, grow, or improve.  Ms. Guaspari's lessons had an impact
which reached beyond the simple playing of notes on a stringed instrument.
Discipline is a learned quality one may draw upon for a lifetime.  The
students learn that to play from the heart, one must first master the
fundamentals.  The only way to do that is the punch line to an appropriate
old cabdriver joke:
Question:  How do you get to Carnegie Hall?
Answer:  Practice, practice, practice.
This same answer can be applied to achieve proficiency in any field,
including the spiritual ones.

Title
Review for Omega Code, The (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Robert Marcarelli
STARRING:         Casper Van Dien, Michael York, Michael Ironside,
Catherine Oxenberg
WRITTEN BY:       Hollis Barton, Stephan Blinn
RATED:            PG-13 for several scenes of shootings
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       2 Peter 1:3-4, Deuteronomy 30:10-20, Romans 16:25-26
Another Christian film with Hollywood-type production values has been
released nationally and once again, it has been pretty much ignored by the
media and critics.
THE OMEGA CODE which is being distributed by Providence Entertainment,
deals with an apocalyptic theme, using the controversial "Bible Code" as a
major plot device.  Despite the lack of a large scale marketing effort and
almost complete snub from both print and online critics, the film did well
enough to place in the top ten films (according to the box office
receipts) in its opening weekend.  This is no doubt due to the on air
support given to the film by Christian broadcasters on TBN.
Certainly the film does not deserve to be ignored, but neither does it
merit rave reviews.  After a promising beginning, it slowly becomes
muddled and confused, lost in its own sea of implausible characters and
transparent plot devices.
Casper Van Dien (STARSHIP TROOPERS) stars as Dr. Gillen Lane,
motivational "guru" and expert on mythology.  His skill in the art of
persuasion is being sought after by Stone Alexander (Michael York, AUSTIN
POWERS: THE SPY WHO SHAGGED ME), millionaire philanthropist and obvious
megalomaniac.  Together they plan to bring the dream of world peace closer
to reality.
Unknown to Gillen, Stone is using a stolen program which unlocks hidden
messages numerically coded within the Bible.  By fulfilling these
prophetic messages, Stone's rise to power increases at a rapid pace.  His
idea of world peace is, in actuality, world domination.  But the final
piece to the code is missing, in the hands of a pair of mysterious
"prophets" who try to warn the world against blindly following the path
that Stone is paving, knowing that it leads away from God and towards
destruction.
Can Gillen, who has begun to have "visions" that he cannot explain,
discover Stone's evil intents in time?  What is the final message of the
Bible Code which has been kept out of Stone's hands?  Both of these are
important questions but not as important as the one which must be asked...
"Why isn't this a better film?"
Part of the answer lies with the script by Hollis Barton and Stephan
Blinn, who between them have no other screen credits.  Instead of
developing fresh and interesting characters, they have relied upon
superficial and clichéd stock characters which stretch the limits of
credibility.
Mr. Van Dien, who looks like a TOP GUN recruiting poster, is hard pressed
to pull off the role asked of him.  He has yet to develop the charisma
that would explain the influence or popularity which his character
supposedly enjoys.
I must be quick to state that I applaud any effort to bring biblically
minded stories to the movies.  And there is much within THE OMEGA CODE
that is noteworthy.  Here we find the idea of an antichrist rising to
power under the guise of philanthropy and altruistic works; the spiritual
struggle which is waged daily;  the superiority of God's power over any
other force, whether it be spiritual or physical; and the idea that each
of us have a choice to make - that as we choose to turn to God for
guidance and protection, God is faithful to guide and protect.
But to this reviewer, the true weakness of the film is the element which
probably appealed the most to the filmmakers.  The "phenomenon" of The
Bible Code (which "predicted" Hitler's rise and Princess Diana's death,
among other events) is an example of a trend that mankind has followed
throughout the centuries.  We, as a people, instead of just reading the
Word which God has revealed, oftentimes prefer to read into the Word.  We
are fascinated by hidden messages and unexplained prophetic-like
inferences.
Such things distract from the true purpose of studying the Word.  God has
given us all things pertaining to life and godliness.  With His Word, we
have the knowledge of how to live a life more than abundant.  Instead of
embracing the Bible Code, we would be better served if we would simply
embrace the Bible.

Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)
DIRECTED BY:       Brad Bird
STARRING (THE VOICES OF): Jennifer Aniston, Harry Connick Jr., Eli
Marienthal, Christopher McDonald, Vin Diesel, John Mahoney, M. Emmet Walsh
WRITTEN BY:        Tim McCanlies
RATED:             PG for fantasy action and mild language
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:        Genesis 2:7, Psalms 104:29-30, Psalms 146:4
Moms around the world understand that there is something about stray
animals and young boys.  The words, "Can I keep him?" have been heard by
mothers almost as much as the words, "I didn't do it!"
Stray animals are one thing.  But how would you like your child to bring
home a 50 foot metal robot from outer space?  Such is the dilemma facing
Annie Hughes (voice by Jennifer Aniston, FRIENDS) in the new Warner
Brothers' film, THE IRON GIANT.
Warner Brothers has certainly improved their animated track record with
this delightfully scripted and imaginatively drawn tale of a boy and his
giant friend.  There is something to please every age group in this film.
In fact, in the screening audience (of which I was a part) was a 50/50
mixture of children and parents.  In most instances, the laughter of the
parents drowned out the higher pitched squeals of the younger set.
Hogarth Hughes (voice by Eli Marienthal, JACK FROST) is your average,
over-imaginative American young boy circa 1957, who is always on the alert
for invaders from Mars, or commie spies.  After hearing a noise coming
from his backyard, and seeing a path of destruction leading into the
woods, he goes out to investigate.  He soon finds the source of the
inadvertent destruction.  A 50 foot metal man/robot leaves quite a wake.
Befriending a giant metal-eating robot is relatively easy.  Hiding him is
something else entirely.  With the help of beatnik/junk dealer/artist Dean
McCoppin (voice by Harry Connick Jr, HOPE FLOATS) Hogarth shows great
ability in keeping his new oversized friend a secret.  But it isn't easy.
The government, hearing of strange occurrences in Hogarth's small town of
Rockwell, has sent a representative, Kent Mansley (voice by Christopher
MacDonald, LEAVE IT TO BEAVER) to investigate.    Soon, the entire army
has been called in to destroy what they perceive to be a menace to the
American way of life.
The script by Tim McCanlies (DANCER TEXAS, POP. 81) is based upon the
characters from the British children's story, "The Iron Man."  The story
has been Americanized and set in the '50s in order to capture some of the
paranoia of the times.
On one level, the movie is about Hogarth teaching the giant that everyone
has the ability to choose who or what he will be.  Though designed as a
weapon of great destructive power, the giant can vow, like Superman, to
only use his powers for good.  Director Brad Bird (FAMILY DOG) apparently
pitched the concept of the movie to Warner Brothers by asking the
questions, "What if a gun chose not to be a gun?  What if a gun had a
soul?"
There are other themes running through THE IRON GIANT.  Friendship,
sacrifice, judging by appearances... But integral to the story is the idea
of an eternal soul that lives on after we die.  Certainly this concept
makes for a sweet and happy story, one that is utilized to great effect in
this movie.  But it does not have the support of scripture.
According to God's own Word, there is nothing eternal about a man's soul.
In Hebrew, the phrase, "living soul" is translated from the words,
"nephesh chay" which are more literally rendered, "breathing creature."
Defined by the scriptures, our soul is literally our breath life... which
ends when we stop breathing.
It is the spirit in man, which is a gift of God and distinguishable from
a man's soul, that is of an eternal and divine nature.  Perhaps it may
sound like splitting hairs or engaging in semantics, but keeping the
distinction between spirit and soul is vitally important for one's
understanding.  Failure to do this has led many to the false doctrines of
spiritualism, magic, reincarnation and a host of other erroneous beliefs.
With that one caveat, I can recommend THE IRON GIANT as a fun,
entertaining and enjoyable film suitable for all ages.

Title
Review for Cider House Rules, The (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Lasse Hallstrom
STARRING:         Tobey Maguire, Michael Caine, Charlize Theron, Delroy
Lindo, Paul Rudd
WRITTEN BY:       John Irving
RATED:            PG-13 for mature thematic elements, sexuality, nudity,
substance abuse, and some violence
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       Proverbs 3:5, Proverbs 28:26, Jeremiah 10:23
It is hard to imagine that a movie which includes abortion and incest as
prominent plot devices could be so sensitive, so delicate, so insightful
and yes, even so enjoyable.  Somehow, THE CIDER HOUSE RULES manages to
keep an even keel in the face of the harsh subject matter and allows a
substantial amount of heart to shine through.
Set in the 1940's, the film tells the story of a unique young man named
Homer Wells (Tobey Maguire, RIDE WITH THE DEVIL).  An orphan, twice
rejected as an infant by possible adoptive parents, he grows up in the
care and under the tutelage of Dr. Wilbur Larch (Michael Caine, LITTLE
VOICE), father figure to the orphans of St. Cloud, obstetrician or
abortionist to the unhappily pregnant women who come there seeking his
help.
Figuring that as long as Homer was going to stay at the orphanage, he
might as well be of use, Dr. Larch begins teaching him all he knows about
obstetrics.  Soon Homer is delivering babies like a professional.  He
refuses to perform abortions, instead wondering why the couples just
didn't behave more responsibly.  Larch, too old and experienced to have
such youthful ideals, marvels that Homer "continues to have such high
expectations of people."
Such is the result of an insulated upbringing.  Though skilled in certain
medical procedures, Homer remains woefully naive and ignorant about most
everything else.  He finally figures that in order to find his place in
the world, he must go out into it.
Befriending a young couple who had come to see Dr. Larch, he hitches a
ride with them and parlays that into landing a job as an apple picker with
a group of black migrant workers at the orchard where they lived. Thus,
Homer begins his worldly instruction, with new friend Candy Kendall
(Charlize Theron, THE ASTRONAUT'S WIFE) a willing tutor.
Tobey Maguire is well cast yet again as an inherently good man who is
seeking answers to life's questions... many of which he was unaware needed
to be asked.  He demonstrates a quiet strength and thoughtful curiosity
that is both warm and appealing.
Michael Caine is, in a word, brilliant as the caring caretaker of these
orphans, many of whom he helped to bring into the world.  Calling them
"princes of Maine, kings of New England" in his ritualistic goodnight, Mr.
Caine manages to communicate the love and commitment Larch has towards
these children without becoming maudlin or saccharine.
Delroy Lindo (A LIFE LESS ORDINARY) has many powerful moments as Mr.
Rose, the strong and charismatic leader of the apple pickers whom Homer
joins.
Director Lasse Hallstrom (WHAT'S EATING GILBERT GRAPE?) and
screenwriter/novelist John Irving (THE WORLD ACCORDING TO GARP), who
adapted his own work for this movie deserve much of the credit for the
balanced approach to the sensitive subject matter.  Regardless of one's
personal stand on the divisive matter of abortion, it is hard to imagine
anyone becoming offended by the evenhanded treatment used by these
filmmakers.
The title is a reference to a list of rules posted in the quarters of the
illiterate apple pickers.  Figuring the rules didn't apply to them since
they didn't have a hand in writing them, they decide to ignore the list
and make up their own rules as they go along.  Dr. Larch, in his own way,
acts similarly.
There is a danger in that line of reasoning.  God has also given us a set
of rules.  Unlike the list posted in the cider house, God's rules, if
followed, promise us benefits beyond our imagination.   And yet, many
continue to ignore His "rules" preferring to make up their own as they go
through life.
"Trust in the LORD with all thine heart; and lean not unto thine own
understanding." Proverbs 3:5 [KJV]
Just as a builder follows a designer's blueprint or a conductor follows a
composer's score, why shouldn't we follow the rules of life given to us by
life's architect for our own blessing?

Title
Review for Snow Falling on Cedars (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Scott Hicks
STARRING:         Ethan Hawkes, Youki Kudoh, James Cromwell, Rick Yune,
Sam Shepard, Max Von Sydow
WRITTEN BY:       Ron Bass, Scott Hicks
RATED:            PG-13 for disturbing images, sensuality, and brief
strong language
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       1 John 3:13, John 17:14, John 15:18-19
Befitting of its picturesque name, SNOW FALLING ON CEDARS sure is pretty
to watch.  But it doesn't take long to realize that the film moves with
the same plodding pace as a man trying to trudge uphill along an unplowed
street following a blizzard.  Exquisitely beautiful but excruciatingly
slow sums up Scott Hicks' (SHINE) latest endeavor.
The film takes a look at stateside Japanese-American relations during the
time of the Second World War.  Set in the scenic Pacific Northwest, SNOW
FALLING ON CEDARS centers around a murder trial where American-born Kazuo
Miyamoto (Rick Yune in his film debut) is accused of murdering his boyhood
friend, an American fisherman.
Covering the trial is Ishmael Chambers (Ethan Hawke, GATTICA), a young
newspaperman for the small community on San Piedro Island.  As we see in a
series of flashbacks, Ishmael has a number of conflicting emotions at
work.  Most importantly, the defendant's wife, Hatsue (Youki Kudoh,
MYSTERY TRAIN) was Ishmael's secret childhood sweetheart in a severed
relationship which was never reconciled.  At least, not as far as Ishmael
was concerned.
Secondly, there's the memory of his father (Sam Shepard, SAFE PASSAGE),
also a newspaperman who had the conviction to take an unpopular stand
against the injustice being carried out via the internment of
Japanese-American citizens during the 1940's.  This earned Ishmael's
father the respect of the Japanese community and has given Ishmael some
mighty big shoes to fill.  The tension, what little there is, comes from
our wondering whether Ishmael will even try.
Based upon the award winning novel by David Guterson, the screenplay (Ron
Bass, ENTRAPMENT and Scott Hicks, SHINE) takes a non-lineal approach to
telling its story, jumping from decade to decade, from prewar to postwar
to finally, in the war.   While this can often be an effective device,
here it serves to distance us from the characters instead of drawing us
into them.  Instead of revealing more about the characters' lives, each
flashback merely adds another layer onto them, like a fresh snow will add
a pristine blanket to a rural landscape.
Mr. Hawke underplays his character and his conflicting emotions almost to
the point that we will be excused for thinking that he didn't have any.
Whether mooning  or pining away for his "forbidden love" of Hatsue, most
of his anguish is internalized and unexpressed.
Ms. Kudoh is just as enigmatic, leaving Hatsue's emotional life to be
displayed by the actress who played the character as a young girl.  In
fact, we gain more insight into Ishmael and Hatsue from the fine work done
by young Reeve Carney and Ann Suzuki who play the same characters as
children than we do from their adult counterparts.
Max Von Sydow (WHAT DREAMS MAY COME) as Kazuo's defense attorney,
provides support in what is a relatively minor role as does Sam Shepard as
the principled newspaperman and father to Ishmael.
Taking a stand by publicly denouncing the government's mistreatment of
the Japanese-American community who lived on San Piedro Island was not
without a price.  Ishmael's father was scorned, his paper lost
subscribers, and his family was threatened with physical harm.  That type
of reaction is one which we conceivably may experience in our own lives
whenever we choose to stand upon the truth of God's Word.  God's Word
prepares those who choose to follows Its teachings by letting us know what
to expect from those with opposing views:
"Marvel not, my brethren, if the world hate you."  1 John 3:13 [KJV]
"I have given them thy word; and the world hath hated them, because they
are not of the world, even as I am not of the world."  John 17:14 [KJV]
Taking a stand because it is the right thing to do is oftentimes hard
because we know that it may make us unpopular for a time.  What we should
remember is that it also makes us well-pleasing in God's sight.  And
ultimately, it is for Him we live.

Title
Review for Mansfield Park (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Patricia Rozema
STARRING:         Francis O'Connor, Harold Pinter, Embeth Davidtz,
Alessandro Nivola, Jonny Lee Miller
WRITTEN BY:       Patricia Rozema
RATED:            PG-13 for brief violent images, sexual content, and drug
use.
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       Matthew 19:5, 1 Peter 3:1-8, Ephesians 5:21-33
If this keeps up, Jane Austen (SENSE AND SENSIBILITY, PRIDE AND
PREJUDICE) may have to apply for posthumous membership to the Screen
Writers Guild.  Yet another novel of hers has made the transition to the
silver screen.  MANSFIELD PARK is a turn of the century (18th century
going on 19th) story about love among the classes as well as an
examination into proper society and family ties.
Ten year old Fanny Price (Hannah Taylor-Gordon, JAKOB THE LIAR), taken
from her mother and father and the poverty in which they dwell, is sent to
live with her aunt and the privileged class at Mansfield Park, under the
stern patriarchal hand of her uncle, Sir Thomas Bertram (Harold Pinter,
MOJO)
Spending her days reminded of her lower status, she also invents and
writes fanciful stories during her private times.   Fanny eventually grows
to become a beautiful, intelligent, and engaging heroine (quite unlike the
original character which Ms. Austen originally penned in her novel.)
Writer/director Patricia Rozema (WHEN NIGHT IS FALLING) is responsible
for the textual changes.  From a purely dramatic perspective, the revision
makes perfect sense and improves the film's audience appeal.  What Ms.
Rozema has done is to infuse the main character with much of Ms. Austen's
own personality by including excerpts from the author's journals, giving
that dialogue to Fanny.
The result is a central character that is immediately appealing.  As the
grown Fanny, Australian actress Frances O'Connor (ALL ABOUT ADAM) does
wonderfully textured work.  At times, Ms. Rozema has Fanny address the
camera directly to communicate many of the novel's more introspective
observations.  This is a difficult device to work seamlessly into a period
film and it is to Ms. O'Connor's credit that it works as well as it does.
The central theme which gives the story its legs in an old one... Whether
it is better to marry for love or for social standing?  Fanny has fallen
in love with her cousin Edmund (Jonny Lee Miller, PLUNKETT & MACLEANE) who
appears fond of her as well.  His attentions are soon divided as the
stylish and socially acceptable Mary Crawford (Embeth Davidtz,
BICENTENNIAL MAN) enters the picture along with her equally acceptable
brother Henry (Alessandro Nivola, INVENTING THE ABBOTTS) who eventually
sets his romantic sights upon Fanny.
While Mary and Henry are evidently less than sincere in their affections,
their presence does provide the movie and the main characters with the
necessary conflict that keeps our interest until the film's appropriately
Austen-like ending.
Other thematic devices include a awkwardly inserted reference to the
source of the wealth of Mansfield Park... the slave trade.  There is also
a hint of both lesbianism and incest but neither is carried very far and
is soon forgotten.
The motivation for marriage remains the primary thematic thrust.  Fanny's
cousin, Maria Bertram (Victoria Hamilton, PERSUASION) is an example of one
making a poor match, marrying a well-to-do fool who is able to make her
comfortable, but never happy.  Fanny's own mother, trapped in her chosen
life of squalor warns Fanny by admitting that her situation is due to the
fact that she "married for love."
  Fanny, given those two terrible examples, and faced with the same
choice is understandably indecisive as to which way to lean.
The spiritual answer, of course, lies in the middle of those two
extremes.  Marriage is not a cold, calculating decision based upon
self-preservation.  Neither is it a senseless decision made in the warm
afterglow of a passionate embrace.
In the purest sense, marriage forms an insoluble union whereby two people
agree to function as one.
"And said, For this cause shall a man leave father and mother, and shall
cleave to his wife: and they twain shall be one flesh?" Matthew 19:5 [KJV]
Love and logic can be combined.  God's Word contains both.  So does a
marriage based upon His truth.

Title
Review for Brokedown Palace (1999)
DIRECTED BY:      Jonathan Kaplan
STARRING:         Claire Danes, Kate Beckinsale, Bill Pullman, Jacqui Kim,
Daniel Lapaine, Lou Diamond Phillips
WRITTEN BY:       David Arata
RATED:            PG-13 for brief strong material, drug related material,
and some violent content.
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       2 Corinthians 5:10, Ecclesiastes 12:14, Romans 14:12
BROKEDOWN PALACE has three things working against it.  It has been done
before.  (MIDNIGHT EXPRESS)  It has been done recently.  (RETURN TO
PARADISE)  And it has been done better.  (Both of the above)  But since
lack of originality has never stopped filmmakers, we find ourselves with
another opportunity to examine what happens when American tourists are
arrested for drug smuggling while in a foreign country.
Alice and Darlene are best friends.  Deciding that they are deserving of
one last unforgettable vacation together after their high school
graduation, they make plans to travel to Thailand.  Why?  They have no
real reason except a hotel room there can be had for six dollars per
night.  Besides, Thailand means "freedom", a piece of trivia that proves
irresistible to two naive and iconoclastic young girls.  Looking for a way
to break free of the "oppression" of their privileged upbringing, they
pack their bags and head to Thailand, giggling all the way.
Upon encountering the intense and unrelenting heat of Eastern Asia, Alice
gets the brainstorm to fraudulently lounge pool side at a five star
resort.  There they meet Nick Parks who, after partying with them, invites
them on a weekend jaunt to Hong Kong.  But a funny thing happens on the
way to Macao... they get busted for possession of heroin and tossed into
prison without a moment of hesitation.
The rest of the movie deals with their attempts to prove their innocence,
first to the authorities, then to their lawyer, and finally to themselves.
Claire Danes (THE MOD SQUAD) is Alice, the "wild" one of the duo.
Throughout the film, Miss Danes, bravely defiant and wearing her teen-aged
angst on her shoulder like a badge of honor, poses and postures more than
she acts.  Whatever it is that she's doing is not enough to lift the story
by newcomers Adam Fields and David Arata out of the melodramatic rut that
it has dug for itself.
Kate Beckinsale (THE LAST DAYS OF DISCO) plays Darlene with a bit more
subtlety.  The more reserved of the pair, Miss Beckinsale conveys a
sweetness and charm that is set in contrast to the bleak and unforgiving
environment into which her character is thrust.
Bill Pullman (LAKE PLACID) and Jacqui Kim (STAR TREK: GENERATIONS)
portray the girls' lawyers, Yankee Hank Green and his wife Yon.  They take
the case, at first for the money it brings and then later for the
injustice being levied against their clients.  Mr. Pullman's performance
as a man trying to work in a strange and crooked system is the best thing
about the movie.
Director Jonathan Kaplan (THE ACCUSED) obviously positioned the film to
appeal to the teen-age market.  It has the feel of being made with the
same arrogance of youth and counterculture mentality that seems to be so
prevalent among our teens.  The parents of the film are either helpless
and weak or hopelessly opinionated fools.  They are rendered powerless
because they work within the system rather than against it.
It is a system that does not look favorably upon our heroines.  The girls
learn that in Thailand, when accused of a crime, their entire lives come
under scrutiny.  As the Republicans tried to tell us in 1992, "character
does matter."
Ultimately, we will all be judged according to our actions and words.
Not by a crooked or corrupt system which operates on bribery and pride but
rather by the Judge of all righteousness before whom all will eventually
stand.
"For we must all appear before the judgment seat of Christ; that every
one may receive the things done in his body, according to that he hath
done, whether it be good or bad." 2 Corinthians 5:10 [KJV]
At that time, neither bribes nor excuses will have an impact.  The only
things that will change the outcome of our time before the judgment seat
of Christ  are the actions we take and the decisions we make prior to
reaching it.

Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
DIRECTED BY:     Kinka Usher
STARRING:        Hank Azaria, Janeane Garofalo, Greg Kinnear, William H.
Macy, Paul Reubens, Geoffrey Rush, Ben Stiller
WRITTEN BY:      Neil Cuthbert
RATED:           PG-13 for comic action violence and crude humor
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:      2 Corinthians 2:11, Ecclesiastes 4:9-12, 1 Corinthians
12:18-27
For every super hero there are a hundred wannabees. In the super hero
business, wannabees are those good hearted men and women with something
less than superpowers who nonetheless have a burning desire to fight
crime and avenge the righteous. MYSTERY MEN is a film about them.  
Champion City already has its resident protector. But Captain Amazing
(Greg Kinnear, AS GOOD AS IT GETS), his uniform tattooed with product
endorsements, has done his job so well, there simply aren't any super
villains left to vanquish. Enter Casanova Frankenstein (Geoffrey Rush,
ELIZABETH) who easily tricks the captain and holds him captive while he
makes plans to destroy the city. 
With Captain Amazing incapacitated, the only ones standing in
Frankenstein's way are our would-be heroes: Six kooks in funny looking
costumes. They are: The Shoveler (William H. Macy, A CIVIL ACTION),
expert with a spade, not so good explaining his pastime activities to
his wife; Mr. Furious (Jerry Stiller, THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY)
whose only talent seems to be in getting mad; The Blue Raja (Hank
Azaria, GODZILLA) who flings his mother's flatware (forks and spoons
only) with pinpoint accuracy; The Bowler (Janeane Garofalo, PERMANENT
MIDNIGHT) who converses with her father's skull encased in her bowling
ball; The Spleen (Paul Reubens, PEEWEE'S BIG ADVENTURE) whose flatulence
is so noxious it literally knocks out his opponents; and The Invisible
Boy (Kel Mitchell, GOOD BURGER) who can only turn invisible if no one
looks at him. 
Together, these dimwitted defenders of truth and justice, under the
guidance of The Sphinx (Wes Studi, DEEP RISING) who talks in a fortune
cookie language, ("He who questions training only trains himself to ask
questions"), must rise to the challenge of saving their city and their
city's hero from certain doom. 
MYSTERY MEN is based on the DARK HORSE comic books by Bob Burden. With
such an unquestionably talented cast as has been assembled, it is
disappointing to say that this is not a better film. The problem lies
primarily with director Kinka Usher who is making his feature film
debut. Mr.  Usher is perhaps best known for his award winning talking
Chihuahua Taco Bell commercials. No doubt he has learned that capturing
an audience's attention for 30 seconds is a lot easier than doing the
same over a 90 minute span. 
The script is weak, the humor rather puerile, and the actors, excepting
the work of Mr. Kinnear and Mr. Macy, seem lost in a sea of good ideas
gone bad. Mr. Kinnear is amusingly smug as the corporate sponsored
Captain Amazing. Mr. Macy, as the crewcut wearing, shovel-wielding
epitome of a working man, wears his idealistic values on his sleeve. His
consistency, as a character, is part of the glue that keeps this movie
from falling completely apart. 
A film of this scope needed a much firmer hand and clearer vision than
Mr. Usher provided. The concept is one that is actually quite
appealing... Working class men and women who have unusual yet obviously
developed skills, acting out the role of "super-hero" to benefit a
society that barely is aware of their existence. Their success comes
only from their working in unison. They must combine their various
talents in order to have any possibility to defeat their common foe. 
Followers of Christ must work in the same manner. By combining our
individual talents, knowledge and abilities, we lend support and
strength to each other's weaknesses. Together, with God, we have the
prevailing strength necessary to stand against our spiritual enemy. The
scriptures say: 
It is folly to enter into the spiritual competition alone. As the Sphinx
might say: "He who fails to stand with team, will stand to fail alone." 

Title
Review for Bicentennial Man (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Chris Columbus
STARRING:         Robin Williams, Embeth Davidtz, Sam Neill, Oliver Platt
WRITTEN BY:       Nicholas Kazan
RATED:            PG for language and some sexual content
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       Job 33:4, Genesis 2:7, Acs 17:24-25
A robot/android with a positronic brain who desperately wants to know
what it is to be human?  Didn't we see this done (and done better) on TV's
Star Trek: The Next Generation?
Director Chris Columbus and star Robin Williams, who last teamed up to
bring us MRS. DOUBTFIRE, join forces again for the futuristic
faux-morality tale, BICENTENNIAL MAN.  Based on an Isaac Asimov story, the
film begins in the year 2005 with the delivery of  a household appliance
to the home of Richard Martin (Sam Neill, EVENT HORIZON).  This appliance
is an NDR-114 robot nicknamed Andrew by Little Miss (Hallie Kate
Eisenberg, THE INSIDER), the youngest member of the family. He will spend
the next 200 years in an attempt to be accepted by the world as something
other than a Sharper Image catalogue item.
Encouraged by the family who owns him, Andrew begins to explore various
facets of humanity.  Whenever he finds himself falling short of the human
experience, his standard reaction is to say "That won't do" before going
off to correct the defect.  Over time, he develops and incorporates humor,
taste, facial expressions, a central nervous system, a desire for freedom,
and last but not least... a functioning male anatomical "package".  He
also sees his original family die and "lives" to see the generation after
them die as well.  His next step on the road to humanity is going to have
to be his own mortality.
The 200 years pass quickly in this roughly 2˝ hour long film (That's
about 45 seconds per year) and yet the film itself tends to drag by,
weighed down by its own pomposity.   What begins as a lighthearted family
romp in the comedic style of MRS. DOUBTFIRE rapidly evolves into a
self-important, new-age minded movie equivalent of a warm and fuzzy group
hug where the physical intimacy is forced rather than genuinely
spontaneous.
Mr. Williams has some amusing moments as the titanium plated gentleman's
gentleman.  But unlike Dorothy's Tin Man, Andrew's heart never appears to
be missing.  From the very beginning, he demonstrates a curiosity and
affection for the humans he serves.  Most of the growth or development of
the character is seen in the external improvements rather than in an
internal realization.  Stretched over the length of this movie, the
characterization becomes transparently thin.
Embeth Davidtz (MANSFIELD PARK) in a dual role which has her playing both
Little Miss and her grandchild, Portia, serves as the love interest for
Andrew.  Knowing that she cannot invest her emotions in a machine, she
nonetheless must admit that no human tugs at her heart in quite the same
way.
Oliver Platt (LAKE PLACID) brightens the screen as a kindly robotics
engineer who drolly helps Andrew realize his goal to become accepted as
human.  And Sam Neill as Andrew's first (and last) owner shows a
compassion and endearing affection towards his animatronic property turned
friend.
Chris Columbus tries to look at the age-old question "What is the meaning
of life?" by turning the question on its head and simply asking, "what
defines life?"  Of course, he isn't up to the challenge of answering his
own question which he nimbly sidesteps.  Were the question posed to a
biblically minded person, the answer is readily available:
"The spirit of God hath made me, and the breath of the Almighty hath
given me life."  Job 33:4 [KJV]
Despite the technological breakthroughs of the modern world, one thing
remains clear.  Regardless of how much man may make something to resemble
a human, the God-given life that is in us cannot be duplicated.
Andrew's quest for humanity is a noble but futile search.  We may someday
reach a point where we can build a machine like an NDR-114 with artificial
intelligence, but to infuse that machine with a soul life is something
that will always remain beyond our purview.  God, after all, is the
Creator of all life.

Title
Review for Messenger: The Story of Joan of Arc, The (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Luc Besson
STARRING:         Milla Jovovich, John Malkovich, Faye Dunaway, Dustin
Hoffman
WRITTEN BY:       Luc Besson, Andrew Birkin
RATED:            R for strong graphic battles, a rape, and some language.
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       1 John 4:1, Ephesians 3:2-5, Proverbs 13:17
For a movie with such deep religious and spiritual undertones, it is
surprising to find THE MESSENGER: THE STORY OF JOAN OF ARC such an ungodly
mess.
In the early to mid 1400's, there was little in the way of spiritual
light to be found shining from the heart of a man or woman.  The church
was a dismally dark and oppressive place. France was involved in "The
Hundred Years War" against England.  There was no strong political
leadership in the country.  Morale was low, there being little hope for
the future.  It was within this setting that a young French girl began
hearing "voices" and seeing "visions."
Convinced that these were messages from God, she brazenly demanded to see
the dauphin in order to deliver the message directly to him.  The message:
If he would give her an army to command, she would deliver to him the
crown.  He does... And she does.  Then, once seated on the throne, he
abandons her to her English captors.
Director Luc Besson (THE FIFTH ELEMENT) may have co-wrote the script but
he never appeared to have a proper handle on the material.  The
inconsistencies of the cast, the confusing blur of the violent battle
scenes, the inappropriate musical score, and the lack of a vibrant life
force at the center of the film adds up to a largely disappointing end
product which is oftentimes unintentionally laughable.
His biggest miscue was to cast his wife, Milla Jovovich (THE FIFTH
ELEMENT) in the title role.  Ms. Jovovich, looks spectacular as Joan, clad
in battle armor, astride a similarly protected horse.  If looks were
enough to fully convey a character, she would have been brilliant.  Since
it isn't, she tried (and failed) to act the part.  Her Joan is unbalanced,
"inspiring" the troops merely by screaming stridently and waving her
banner or sword over her head like a woman possessed.
John Malkovich (BEING JOHN MALKOVICH) fares a bit better as the dauphin,
who Joan would see on the throne as Charles VII.  An easily manipulated
man, his weakness of character foreshadows the betrayal of Joan which
would lead to her death.
Faye Dunaway (THE THOMAS CROWN AFFAIR) gives a strong performance in
minimal screen time as the dauphin's mother-in-law and chief advisor.  The
army under Joan's command are comprised of comical figures, more stooges
than soldiers.  The one exception would be Tcheky Karyo (LA FEMME NIKITA)
as Dunois, the man who was leading the attack prior to Joan's arrival.
Trying to plan a systematic campaign, he sees his leadership authority
negated by Joan's insistence on following her "visions."
Dustin Hoffman (SPHERE) has a small inhuman role as Joan's conscience
which begins speaking to her while awaiting trial.  Dressed like cloaked
monk, he leads her to doubt herself and her "revelations."  As well she
should.
Scriptures do speak of revelation.  God, via His gift of holy spirit, is
able to communicate to men.  Three of the nine manifestations of holy
spirit listed in 1 Corinthians 12 deal with receiving revelation.  They
are:  word of knowledge, word of wisdom, and discerning of spirits.  Even
the scriptures themselves are a result of God giving revelation to His
"holy men... who spake as they were moved by holy spirit (i.e. by
revelation.)"
"Beloved, believe not every spirit, but try the spirits whether they are
of God: because many false prophets are gone out into the world."  1 John
4:1 [KJV]
Joan's end, (being burned at the stake at the age of 19), the frenzy (mob
rule) and blood lust her inspiration wrought, and the death, pain, or
suffering which followed her campaign all point to a devilish influence
rather than a godly one.
While her conviction and intense believing remains an admirable quality,
she was, as others have been before and since, misled by the spiritual
master of deception.  As a messenger, she was quite effective.  She was
just confused as to whose message she was carrying.

Title
Review for Play It to the Bone (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Ron Shelton
STARRING:         Woody Harrelson, Antonio Banderas, Lolita Davidovich,
Lucy Liu
WRITTEN BY:       Ron Shelton
RATED:            R for brutal ring violence, strong sexuality including
dialogue, nudity, pervasive language, and some drug content.
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       1 Corinthians 9:24, 2 Timothy 4:7, James 1:2
PLAY IT TO THE BONE is a punch-drunk mess of a movie.  Containing a good
cast but awful acting; an interesting premise but terrible execution, Ron
Shelton (WHITE MEN CAN'T JUMP) gives us a ROCKY story with not one Rocky
but two.
Rocky No. 1 is Vince Boudreau (Woody Harrelson, EDTV), a bald, tattooed,
newly converted Christian, whose idea of Christianity is not using the
name of Christ as a curse word... something that he has not yet
successfully achieved.  Rocky No. 2 is Caesar Dominguez (Antonio Banderas,
THE 13TH WARRIOR), best friend of Vince who is currently dating Vince's
ex-girlfriend, Grace.
Both men are nearing the end of their "almost" careers when a fluke
provides them with a redemptive opportunity.  When both fighters of the
undercard of a Vegas based Mike Tyson title fight become incapacitated,
the fight promoters need to find a quick replacement.  Our boys are tapped
to fight each other, the winner of which is "promised" a shot at a future
title fight.
The film is divided into two sections.  At first, we have a buddy road
picture as our two heroes, in Grace's "sassy grassy" green muscle car,
travel through the desert to Vegas in order to make the fight scheduled
for that day.  Along the way we learn about their pasts and the
opportunities that have come and gone by.  Once in Vegas, the movie
settles down to the effectively staged fight sequences between Vince and
Caesar.
Both Mr. Harrelson and Mr. Banderas have provided us with stunning
characterizations in the past, not that we'd know it from their work here.
Mr. Harrelson is uncomfortably awkward, apparently never having gotten a
firm handle on Vince.  The Christian conversion angle simply falls flat
and unbelievable.  Mr. Banderas is uncharacteristically non-charismatic as
Caesar.  Weak and ineffectual, there is little life in his screen
performance.
The other actors involved merely play stereotypes of one sort or another.
Tom Sizemore (SAVING PRIVATE RYAN), Robert Wagner (AUSTIN POWERS II: THE
SPY WHO SHAGGED ME), and Richard Masur (FIRE DOWN BELOW) are crooked
promoters, Lucy Liu (PAYBACK) is a sex-starved hitchhiker looking for a
good time, and Lolita Davidovich (GODS AND MONSTERS), is the shared
girlfriend who can't make her mind up which boxer she prefers.
Because of the weak characters and the lack of screen chemistry between
them, the film flounders with all the appeal of a dead fish until the
boxing match actually begins.  But even then, because the outcome is so
predictably obvious, the suspense factor is negated and we are relegated
to just watching two men pummel each other.
Writer/director Ron Shelton clearly spent much time orchestrating the
fight sequence as it is well photographed, well-choreographed,
well-edited, and well-performed.  If only some of that same detailed
attention had been diverted to the remaining parts of the film.  As it is,
the scenes which require the characters to actually talk to one another
are weak and laughable.
The title is actually the most interesting aspect of the film.  The
phrase, "play it to the bone' is a reference to seeing something all the
way through or not quitting until you've achieved your desired goal.  That
is a biblical principle.
"Know ye not that they which run in a race run all, but one receiveth the
prize? So run, that ye may obtain." 1 Corinthians 9:24 [KJV]
Achieving anything worthy in life requires "playing it to the bone".  We
need to develop fully persuaded mindsets and commitment levels in order to
endure and persevere past the obstacles and distractions which lay between
us and our stated objectives.
This is true in practical matters of our physical lives as well as the in
the developing maturity of our spiritual lives.  As a movie, PLAY IT TO
THE BONE is hardly worth our time.  But as a principle of life, the phrase
"play it to the bone" are words to live by.

Title
Review for Random Hearts (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Sydney Pollack
STARRING:         Harrison Ford, Kristin Scott Thomas, Charles Dutton,
Sydney Pollack
WRITTEN BY:       Darryl Ponicsan, Kurt Luedtke
RATED:            R for brief violence, sexuality, and language
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       Philippians 3:13, Job 42:10, John 16:20-22
Mankind does have a proclivity for complicating life.  Such complications
are never more evident than in affairs of the heart.  The new film, RANDOM
HEARTS, tells the "romantic" story of four people.  The twist is that two
of the four are dead.  That rules out any possibility for this being a
romantic comedy.  Call it a romantic tragedy instead.
Harrison Ford (SIX DAYS, SEVEN NIGHTS) stars as Dutch Van Der Broeck, a
DC police sergeant working in the Internal Affairs Division.  His happy
marriage is about to be exposed for the facade that it is when a plane
crashes into the Chesapeake Bay on its way to Miami, FL.  One of the
accident casualties, traveling under an assumed name, is his wife who just
happened to be accompanying another woman's husband.
The other woman is none other than US Congresswoman Kay Chandler, played
by Kristin Scott Thomas (THE HORSE WHISPERER) who is surprised and
embarrassed at her husband's deception, but willing to put it behind her
and move on with her life.  Dutch is not as willing to let it go.
Obsessed with finding out about the details of the affair so as to
understand why it happened, Dutch begins digging for information,
something that the congresswoman, in the middle of her reelection battle,
can ill afford.  So, in order to try and control the potential media
damage, Kay meets with Dutch and they try to make sense of their shared
situation.  With bruised egos and hurt hearts, they visit the site of the
clandestine trysts of their recently deceased spouses and, in so doing,
they become attracted to each other.
At the same time, their lives continue but are not unaffected by the
grief and frustration they are feeling.  Van Der Broeck risks his career
and life pursuing and baiting a suspect when he has no hard evidence
against him.  Chandler, touched by the level of brutal honesty upon which
Van Der Broeck insists, finds that she may no longer have the stomach to
mount an effective political campaign where truth is often a liability.
Harrison Ford can play the no-nonsense cop roles with aplomb and does so
with some level of effectiveness here.  But with spiked or tousled hair
and pierced ear jewelry, it appears that Mr. Ford is attempting a more
youthful appearance.  To this reviewer's eye, it is having the opposite
effect.  I did not believe him as a romantic lead in this picture.
Kirstin Scott Thomas, on the other hand, was fully believable.
Demonstrating the class of a woman of means and power, yet still managing
to show the frailty and vulnerability of a woman in love, Ms. Thomas is
captivating on screen.
  Sydney Pollack (TOOTSIE), as director, is at the helm of RANDOM HEARTS,
keeping the movie at its steady but interminably slow pace.  The nearly
two and one-quarter hour length of the movie works against the picture.
The longer it runs, the more illogical and weak Mr. Ford's character
appears.  His inability to let go of the pain that his wife's infidelity
brought to him threatens the promise of beginning a new relationship with
Kay.
Living in the past can be a trap in and of itself.  We may learn from the
past and we may hope for the future.  But to be effective as sons and
daughters of God, we must live in the present.
"Brethren, I count not myself to have apprehended: but this one thing I
do, forgetting those things which are behind, and reaching forth unto
those things which are before."  Philippians 3:13 [KJV]
Certainly grief is something that we must all handle and we understand
that there is an appropriate amount of time needed to gain full control of
one's thoughts and emotions when dealing with a loss of a loved one.
But staying in a perpetual state of mourning, anger or resentment is
damaging and dangerous as it could easily lead to spirits of depression or
melancholy.  Such continual states of being are very selfish as one's full
attention and energy of thought is directed inward.  It should be
remembered that Job's deliverance and restoration did not occur until
after he prayed... not for himself, but for his friends.

Title
Review for Story of Us, The (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Rob Reiner
STARRING:         Bruce Willis, Michelle Pfeiffer, Rob Reiner, Rita
Wilson, Tim Matheson
WRITTEN BY:       Alan Zweibel, Jessie Nelson
RATED:            R for language and brief sexuality
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       Ephesians 4:26, Mark 10:1-9, Ecclesiastes 9:9
Cinematic stories about an introspective journey are among the most
difficult to tell.  So, telling a story about two such journeys
simultaneously is understandably twice as hard.  Director Rob Reiner's
(THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT) latest work, THE STORY OF US, is a strange
mixture of a movie.  Combining comedy and drama, pathos with vulgar sexual
bantering, the film contains both hits and misses but ultimately doesn't
quite succeed in sustaining an emotional connection with its audience.
Ben (Bruce Willis, THE SIXTH SENSE) and Katie (Michelle Pfeiffer, THE
DEEP END OF THE OCEAN) Jordan have been married for fifteen years.  They
have produced two delightful children and the four of them appear to be
enjoying a wonderful life together.  The trouble is, whenever the kids
leave the room, the life leaves with them.  Over time, whatever kindled
the spark of this marriage has long since died out.
The movie focuses on the Jordans' attempts to present a happy facade for
their children's sake even while each is trying to figure out what went
wrong in the marriage and why.  He is more of a free spirited
individual... A fun and spontaneous kind of guy.  She, on the other hand,
feels pressed to be the responsible one of the duo.  And after fifteen
years of being the "designated driver," she resents it.
Using a series of flashbacks, voice-overs, and interviews (a la WHEN
HARRY MET SALLY), Mr. Reiner explores the effect that everyday "life" has
on a marriage relationship. The Jordans move from a happy, sexually
compatible, vibrantly fun couple (seen in the flashbacks) to a pair of
individuals who allow the minor irritations of idiosyncratic behavior to
build and fester until it reaches intolerable levels.  The film's chopped
up structure is used to try to show each character's perspective of their
failing marriage but, in so doing, it manages to distance us from
connecting with those characters.  The non-lineal time line forces us to
view the story with our heads rather than our hearts.
Bruce Willis is very good as the man who hasn't quite grown up.  His
repeated protest of "I am not a third child!" is obviously born of an oft
heard accusation.  There are times when he looses his anger at levels
incongruent for the moment but overall, his work is quite pleasing.
Michelle Pfeiffer is just wonderful.  Few actresses can portray a
deadened soul and still be interesting, but Ms. Pfeiffer does just that.
When her children leave the room, and the camera zooms in for a close up
of her, we literally can see the light go out in her eyes, leaving an
empty shell of a woman.  Her three minute monologue at the end of the film
is singly able to lift the entire project out of its mediocrity and raise
it a notch in our esteem.
Supporting the lead characters are friends played by Rob Reiner (EDTV),
Rita Wilson (SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE), Paul Reiser (MAD ABOUT YOU), and Julie
Haggarty (AIRPLANE).  They are less effective and are disappointingly used
for the sexual bantering mentioned earlier.  Ms. Wilson is seen in the
worse light, coming across as a foul-mouthed harpy.
The premise of the film is something that is important to consider.
Contrary to popular thought and hundreds of romantic comedies, love is not
something one "falls in or out of."  It is a decision one makes.  Once we
decide to love, we take certain actions because of that decision.
"For God so loved the world that He gave His only begotten son."  John
3:16a [KJV]
"For this then is the love of God, that we keep His commandments." 1 John
5:3a [KJV]
Ben and Katie so loved their children, they took actions to hide the fact
that they were considering separation and divorce.  Yet they did not take
the proper action needed to strengthen their own relationship, choosing
instead to suffer silently through the minuscule annoyances experienced
when living with another person.  The mistake they made (and a mistake
many couples make) was to let the little issues go by unresolved.  When we
do that, we aren't building bridges, we're building wedges.  Build a big
enough wedge, and the strongest love won't be able to hold a relationship
together.

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
"For pseudo-intellectual psycho-babble, it was very well acted."  So
decreed my wife as we were leaving a screening of Dreamworks' AMERICAN
BEAUTY.  It remains an insightful summation.
Kevin Spacey (HURLYBURLY) stars as Lester Burnham, a self-described
"ordinary guy with nothing to lose."  Trapped in a soul-sucking job and a
loveless marriage, he has already lost whatever verve or passion for life
that he once had.  His wife, Carolyn, (Annette Benning, IN DREAMS) is cold
and self-absorbed.  His daughter, Jane, (Thora Birch, ALASKA) is sullen
and distant.   These characters may live in the same house, but they are
all very much alone.
Lester's catalyst for change comes in the guise of one of Jane's friends,
a teen aged Lolita named Angela Hayes (Mena Suvari, AMERICAN PIE).  Lester
becomes fixated upon her, making her the object of his fantasies.  It
isn't long before Lester is "reborn." Tired of the life he has, he tries
to recapture the life he lost.  He starts smoking marijuana, pumping iron,
and (most importantly) speaking his mind without care or consideration as
to the impact his words might have.
Meanwhile, Carolyn, a materialistic Martha Stewart wannabe, is solely
focused upon her career as a Realtor.  Her obsession for success makes her
blind to the miserable life she is helping to make for her husband and
child.  Her mantra becomes: "In order to be successful, one must project
an image of success at all times."  She concentrates so much on the image,
she loses sight of the reality.
An opposing view is represented in the Burnham's next door neighbor,
Ricky Fitts (Wes Bentley, BELOVED), an odd but amazingly self-assured teen
aged drug dealer, who begins to take a romantic interest in Jane.  He
looks for the beauty that lies behind every image presented to us.  It is
why he bypasses the beautiful but shallow Angela for Jane in whom he sees
the hidden beauty of her soul.
Ricky uses videotapes to help remember the ever present beauty he claims
lies behind all of life's images.  Inviting Jane to see the most beautiful
thing he has ever videotaped, he shows her the image of a plastic bag
hypnotically swirling in the wind.  Of all the characters in the film,
Ricky is presented as the one who is the most emotionally secure, although
he is not without his own deep psychological scars.
There isn't a weak actor in the cast.  Both Kevin Spacey and Annette
Benning are magnificent in their roles.  I am pleased to say that the hype
surrounding their performances has not been exaggerated.  Thora Birch,
Mena Suvari, Wes Bentley and Chris Cooper (OCTOBER SKY) as Ricky's rigid,
military-minded father all provide ample support.
Where the movie did not live up to the hype, in my estimation, is in the
subject matter itself.  The story it tells is neither original nor
classic.  It is a rather depressing comedy concerning pathetic individuals
trying to find meaning or substance in the lives they lead.  Sadly, they
begin looking in all the wrong places.  There is nothing beautiful in this
AMERICAN BEAUTY.
While it is true that there is a hidden quality behind all of life's
images or experiences, it is not necessarily beautiful.  What it is, is
spirit.  Spirit, of course, comes in two forms:  godly and ungodly.  In
observing the actions, habits, and desires of the on screen characters, it
becomes clear that the spiritual influences which motivate them are
devilish ones.
On the ride home from the theater, my wife and I were able to catalogue
sixteen distinctly different devil spirits who would have been involved in
the influencing of these characters' decisions.  Among them:  a spirit of
envy, a sullen spirit, a spirit of error, a spirit of depression, a spirit
of obsession, a sensual spirit, and a spirit of murder.
To the uninstructed, the above may seem foolish and unbelievable.  But
these devil spirits and others can be biblically documented and
categorized by any who would take the time and effort to study the
Scriptures.  With a working knowledge of the invisible influence of the
devil spirit realm, AMERICAN BEAUTY makes dark but perfect sense.  Without
it, it remains not much more than a well-acted piece of
"pseudo-intellectual psycho-babble."

Title
Review for Stigmata (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Rupert Wainwright
STARRING:         Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Jonathan Pryce, Nia
Long
WRITTEN BY:       Tom Lazarus, Rick Ramage
RATED:            R for intense violent sequences, language, some sexuality
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       Isaiah 52:14, Revelation 22:18-19, Proverbs 30:5-6
"A gift of God?  Can I give it back?"  It's a legitimate question that is
asked by Frankie Paige, a 23 year old hair stylist from Pittsburgh who
inexplicably develops an affliction allegedly only experienced by the
deeply religious.  The fact that she's an atheist is stumping the
religious investigators who have come to study her.  They've come because
her body is being assaulted by an invisible attacker, leaving on her the
marks of the stigmata.  "Why her?" is the question they want answered.
What does it mean?
STIGMATA, a new release from MGM, bears a passing resemblance to THE
EXORCIST, and is being released on the heels of THE SIXTH SENSE and STIR
OF ECHOES, two other supernatural thrillers.  Unlike its two recent
predecessors, STIGMATA focuses upon the depiction of religious phenomenon
and the response of the Roman Catholic Church in the face of such
unexplained events.  As such, it has the rare distinction of being
accurately inaccurate.
After receiving a rosary which belonged to a dead priest, Frankie
(Patricia Arquette, THE HI-LO COUNTRY) begins experiencing attacks from an
unseen force which causes deep wounds through her wrists and feet as well
as lacerations on her back and forehead... the same wounds experienced by
the crucified Jesus.  Such wounds are known in religious circles as
"stigmata."  Hearing of these attacks, the Vatican sends its emissary,
Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Bryne, THE MAN IN THE IRON MASK) to
investigate and prove or disprove the phenomenon.
As Father Kiernan becomes convinced of the spiritual nature of Frankie's
experiences, other factors begin to come to light which implicate the
Roman Catholic Church and its obsessive need for secrecy and
self-preservation at any cost.  Cardinal Houseman (Jonathan Pryce,
TOMORROW NEVER DIES), a high-ranking Vatican official takes a deep
interest in the ongoing investigation and when Frankie begins to speak and
write in Aramaic, the language of Christ, he comes to America and
ominously takes personal command of the situation.
The acting is first rate.  Patricia Arquette is amazing as a young night
clubbing party girl who has no way to understand or comprehend what is
happening to her.  She maintains her believability even in the midst of
unbelievable occurrences.  Gabriel Byrne is appropriately cast as a
scientist turned priest whose faith is tested and even potentially
strengthened by this experience.  Jonathan Pryce is downright
Machiavellian as the evil hearted Cardinal Houseman.
While the movie is both visually stunning and intense in nature, the
story it tells fails to adequately explain the various questions that it
brings to mind.  The concluding scenes, which unsatisfactorily resolves
the storyline, are disappointing on two levels:  From a narrative
perspective, the ending is implausible and only serves to raise a slew of
other questions.  From a spiritual perspective, it is misleading and in
many ways completely inaccurate.  It is impossible to go into more details
without revealing the ending but the scripture references I list at the
beginning of the review will allude to some of the untruths I find
objectionable.
The "gift of God" comment (which comes midway through the film) was a
lame attempt to explain why the stigmata is only experienced by the deeply
religious.  To believe that God would inflict such pain and suffering upon
anyone is beyond blasphemous.  It would contradict everything that God
reveals about Himself through His Word.
Jesus Christ endured the pain of the cross and the physical torture which
led to it (which was far worse than anything seen in the film... The
scriptures state that his body was ravaged so badly he was
unrecognizable.)  He did so for a specific purpose, the redemption and
salvation of all mankind.  To think that there is a godly reason for
anyone else to be subjected to that level of human suffering is to demean
and bring to naught his accomplishments.
Because of his accomplishments, we are able to claim physical wholeness,
manifest power from on high, understand spiritual matters, and lead a life
that is more than abundant.  That is the true gift of God in all its
beauty and divine glory.  Anything else, especially anything so obviously
devilish, is counterfeit.

Title
Review for Fantasia/2000 (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Pixote Hunt, Hendel Butoy, Eric Goldberg, James Algar,
Francis Glebas, Gaetan & Paul Brizzi
CONDUCTED BY:     James Levine
COMPOSED BY:      Ludwig Van Beethoven, Ottorino Respighi, George
Gershwin, Dmitri Shostakovich, Camille Saint-Saens, Paul Dukas, Sir Edward
Elgar, Igor Stravinsky
RATED:            G
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       1 Samuel 16:23, Ephesians 5:19, 1 Chronicles 15:15-16
In 1940, Walt Disney released a filmed experiment.  FANTASIA was a blend
of two art forms: classical music and animation.  While it was not
immediately popular with the audiences of its day, it has since become
recognized as something of a classic.
According to the program notes, it was Mr. Disney's intention to have
FANTASIA be a continual work in progress.  Sixty years later, thanks to
the ongoing efforts of Walt's nephew, a new FANTASIA is being released.
It was not only worth the waiting, it is evidence to just how far
animation has come during the past half-decade.
With seven new sequences and one old favorite, FANTASIA 2000 exhibits an
imagination and respect for its art form that is absent from most other
feature films.  Like the original, FANTASIA 2000 will more than likely
bore the very young, although there is more narrative appeal in this newer
version and the segments appear to be substantially shorter, perhaps a nod
to the shorter attention span of the studio's primary audience.
Ranging from the silly to the sublime, each segment is preceded by a
short, humorous introduction or interstitial by a guest celebrity host,
Steve Martin (BOWFINGER) being the first and most effective.  These are
quickly forgotten as conductor James Levine leads the Chicago Symphony
Orchestra through the musical program which, along with the images drawn
by the Disney team of animators, is thoughtfully and beautifully brought
to a stunning synthesis.
FANTASIA 2000 is being released exclusively in the giant-screened IMAX
theaters, making for a unique viewing experience.  There is enough variety
in the program to provide something enjoyable for everyone and surely,
people will exit the theaters with their own personal favorites.
For me, that would have to be the jazz age story of four unconnected and
discontented people living in NYC who, unknowingly, help each other
realize their dreams.  Drawn in the style of caricaturist Al Hirschfeld
and inspired by George Gershwin's RHAPSODY IN BLUE, the music and images
are blended perfectly resulting in a product greater than the sum of its
two parts.
Children will like the short piece set to CARNIVAL OF THE ANIMALS by
Camille Saint-Saens.  Here, a goofy looking flamingo irritates the rest of
the flock with his yo-yo playing antics. They will also giggle as Donald
Duck, playing Noah's assistant, tries to load the animals into the ark to
the familiar strains of POMP AND CIRCUMSTANCE by Sir Edward Elgar. (While
the depiction is not biblically accurate, it is entertaining and might be
excuse enough to familiarize ourselves with the true record by reading
what is written in Genesis 7.)
A positive note is that the studio has avoided any segment which is as
perversely dark as NIHGT ON BALD MOUNTAIN upon which the original film
ended.  There are some images based upon fantasy such as the flying whales
in Respighi's PINES OF ROME or images which have their roots in mythology
such as the ethereal creatures which tell the story of nature's cycle of
life, death, and rebirth in Igor Stravinsky's FIREBIRD SUITE.  But the
stories they tell are uplifting, containing nothing too frightening for
our younger children.
The darkest segment, spiritually speaking, actually belongs to the only
holdover from the original FANTASIA, Mickey Mouse in THE SORCERER'S
APPRENTICE by Paul Dukas.  But overall, the emotions evoked from FANTASIA
2000 are positive ones, being full of hope and promise.
Music has an impact which can be undeniably felt, capable of leading the
listener to emotional peaks and inspirational highs simply not attainable
through other mediums.  It is no wonder that the Levites, as the priestly
tribe of the Old Testament, were also the appointed musicians.  If
Fantasia 2000 is able to introduce a new audience to music which inspires
and exalts, it will have done an incredible service.

Title
Review for Mumford (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Lawrence Kasdan
STARRING:         Loren Dean, Hope Davis, Jason Lee, Alfre Woodard, Mary
McDonnell, Pruitt Taylor Vince, Zooey Deschanel, David Paymer, Martin
Short, Ted Danson
WRITTEN BY:       Lawrence Kasdan
RATED:            R for sex-related images, language, nudity, and drug
content
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       1 Thessalonians 5:11, Romans 15:1-2, 2 Corinthians 1:3-4
You've got to hand it to Lawrence Kasdan .  When he finds a niche he
likes, he stays with it.  Once again, the writer/director of THE BIG CHILL
has taken a large talented cast and multiple story lines, woven them
together and formed a mostly comedic, but sometimes touching movie.
MUMFORD takes its name from the small town that serves as its setting.
Also from the last name of the central character, "Doc" Mumford.  Though
he has only arrived in Mumford four months, two and one-half weeks ago, he
already has more patients than the town's other two headshrinkers.
Doc Mumford is a young psychologist with an unusual methodology... He
makes it up as he goes along.   He has to, seeing as he has never taken a
course in psychology.  But that doesn't stop him from "treating" the
residents of Mumford, who respond by revealing their "secret lives" to him
without knowing that he has one of his own.
Never having taken the Hippocratic oath, Mumford's amateur status is
manifested in other ways:  He has a tendency to talk about his patients
and their problems to other townspeople, he refuses treatment when it
suits his purposes, and he falls in love with one of his patients.
If having three psychologists (actually, one's a psychiatrist) in a small
town seems excessive, it is only because you haven't met the good people
of Mumford.  They are an eclectic group in need.
Doc Mumford's patients include:  Althea Brockett (Mary McDonnell,
INDEPENDENCE DAY), a compulsive shopper who takes that condition to a new
high; Henry Follett (Pruitt Taylor Vince, COLD AROUND THE HEART), whose
1940's style sexual fantasies somehow don't include a role for him; Skip
Skiperton (Jason Lee, DOGMA), a goof-ball, skateboarding,
multi-billionaire who has learned that it is lonely at the top; Nessa
Watkins (Zooey Deschanel in her film debut) a teenager unhappy with her
looks and life but way too cool to admit it; and Sofie Crisp (Hope Davis,
ARLINGTON ROAD), suffering from the symptoms of Chronic Fatigue Syndrome
and in whom Doc Mumford takes a special interest.
While the movie's structure prevents them from becoming a truly ensemble
cast, each of the actors do fine, credible work in their respective
scenes.  Loren Dean (ENEMY OF THE STATE) appropriately underplays the role
of Doc Mumford, allowing our focus to remain on the various supporting
characters and the effect the "doctor" has upon them.  Alfre Woodard (DOWN
IN THE DELTA) has some good moments as Lily, Doc's friend and sounding
board and perhaps the only resident of Mumford not in need of his help.
While MUMFORD is, at its core, a sweet, charitable film, for some
miscalculated reason Mr. Kasdan included enough sexual images and nudity
to bump the MPAA rating to a well deserved R.  This inclusion distracts
from and weakens the film instead of adding to it.  MUMFORD is a "PG"
movie dressed in "R" clothing that satisfies neither audience.
  The miraculous treatment that the "doctor" has stumbled upon is nothing
new.  It is called "listening and caring."  The people who came to Doc
Mumford needed someone with whom to share their innermost thoughts and
Doc, via his non-clinical, nonprofessional responses, communicated to them
that he genuinely cared for them.  Thus they began their first steps on
the road to healing.
God has called us to do the same for each other:
"Wherefore comfort yourselves together, and edify one another, even as
also ye do."  1 Thessalonians 5:11 [KJV]
There is no godly reason for anyone to ever feel alone in this world.  If
nothing else, we can pour our hearts out to God Who always hears us.  And
as we include God in our lives, we are welcomed into and become part of a
larger community comprised of a family of believers and a household of
faith.

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Paul Thomas Anderson
STARRING:         Tom Cruise, Jason Robards, Philip Baker Hall, Julianne
Moore, William H. Macy, John C. Reilly, Melora Walters
WRITTEN BY:       Paul Thomas Anderson
RATED:            R for strong language, drug use, sexuality, and some
violence
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       Isaiah 43:25, Hebrews 8:12, Psalms 103:12
Take two old and dying men, a lifetime of regrets, a house full of sins,
a thoroughly despicable  man, enough lies, insecurities and other
character defects to keep a team of psychiatrists gainfully employed, then
add a inexplicable meteorological and amphibian-based phenomenon and you
will have summed up MAGNOLIA, the newest film from Paul Thomas Anderson
(BOOGIE NIGHTS).
The movie tells multiple stories, weaving them together, or overlapping
them during the course of its three hour running time.  Would that the
stories were worth the telling.
Earl Partridge (Jason Robards, A THOUSAND ACRES) is dying of cancer.
Bedridden, in much pain, it is obvious that his time is growing short.
His much younger wife played by Julianne Moore (AN IDEAL HUSBAND) is
surprised to find herself struggling with his impending death.  Having
married for money, she discovers that she has actually fallen in love with
the old guy and regrets having cheated and lied.
Earl regrets having cheated on his first wife and estranging himself from
his only son (Tom Cruise, EYES WIDE SHUT), now a misogynist self-help guru
who teaches men how to "Seduce and Destroy,"  His sexual and vulgar
perspective on male/female relationships is so over-the-top as to be
utterly unbelievable.
Meanwhile, Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker Hall, THE INSIDER) is also dying of
cancer.  Not as physically incapacitated as Earl, Jimmy is still able to
perform his duties as the lovable host of a long-running quiz show which
pits adults against children.  The current whiz-quiz-kid is Stanley
Spector (Jeremy Blackman in his film debut) who is tired of the pressure
of performing and is willing to call it quits.  On the other hand, quiz
kid Donnie Smith (William Macy, MYSTERY MEN ) would like nothing more than
to return to the spotlight when he was a "somebody."  His pathetic life is
souring as he can no longer capitalize on his brief 15 minutes of fame
which Stanley is all too eager to relinquish.
Jimmy has his own family crisis as his drug-addict daughter (Melora
Walters, BOOGIE NIGHTS) refuses to have anything to do with him for
reasons  which are not disclosed to us until the end of the film. Grabbing
at one last attempt at happiness she reaches out to a softhearted cop
(John C. Reilly, NEVER BEEN KISSED) even as she tries to push herself away
from him because she deems herself not worthy of his affection.
This dysfunctional group carries on for what seems to be an interminable
two-thirds of the movie.  And then it gets worse, literally raining frogs.
Yes, frogs.  Assuming it to be an intended deus-ex-machina device, it is
an ineffective one because it doesn't seem to faze the characters much.
Oh, they may step gingerly around the splattered frog corpses littering
the streets, but otherwise, the frog shower didn't seem to change their
behavior or pattern of living (or dying).
There is simply too much going on in this movie and most of it is
distasteful to watch.  Mr. Anderson further obscures the film by
incorporating a loud and intrusive sound track that often drowned out the
dialogue, a character who apparently rapped a significant clue to a plot
development which was completely unintelligble, and a heavy handed segment
of "historical" occurances containing ironic twists which set up
absolutely nothing.
One of the recurring themes is found in a line Donnie quotes: "We may be
done with the past, but the past is not done with us."  This is an
absolute lie.  God is in the forgiveness business.  In fact, as we humbly
ask for forgiveness and repent or change our offending mindset, God's Word
says that He not only forgives, He also forgets.
"I, even I, am he that blotteth out thy transgressions for mine own sake,
and will not remember thy sins."  Isaiah 43:25 [KJV]
The spiritual one who keeps bringing up our unrighteous past is the same
one who wants to keep us in a state of condemnation.  Don't let him.  Next
time your spiritual adversary reminds you of your past, take great
pleasure in reminding him of his future.  He hates that.

Title
Review for Dogma (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Kevin Smith
STARRING:         Linda Fiorentino, Ben Affleck, Matt Damon, Jason Mewes,
Chris Rock, Alan Rickman, Salma Hayek, Kevin Smith
WRITTEN BY:       Kevin Smith
RATED:            R for strong language including sex-related dialogue,
violence, crude humor, and some drug content.
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       Mark 7:6-7, 1 Timothy 4:1-3, 1 Thessalonians 2:13
To paraphrase FORREST GUMP, "Dangerous is as dangerous does."  Contrary
to the prescreening buzz, the new Kevin Smith film, DOGMA, is not a danger
to our spiritual well-being.  It may be, at various times, brilliant,
boring, misguided, insightful, or offensive.  But dangerous?  No.  What it
asks us, in its irreverently humorous fashion, is to take a hard look at
our religious institutions and check whether we can still see God there.
If this is considered to be threatening to those institutions, perhaps an
introspective look is long overdue.
The film does levy a number of charges against organized religion,
specifically Roman Catholicism, calling it a place where people don't
celebrate their faith, they mourn it, treating God as more of a burden
than a blessing.
Ben Affleck (FORCES OF NATURE) and Matt Damon (GOOD WILL HUNTING) are a
pair of fallen angels, banished to Wisconsin for having the effrontery to
question God.  A public relations campaign (Catholicism Wow!) headed by
Cardinal Glick (George Carlin, BILL & TED'S EXCELLENT ADVENTURE) has given
them an opportunity to take advantage of a "loophole" in God's edict, and
make their way back into heaven.  The trouble is, if they do so, it would
be proof that God is not infallible and the very fabric of existence would
be shredded.
To stop them, an angel, a muse, an apostle, two prophets and the great,
great, (followed by many more greats), grandniece of Jesus Christ band
together to save both heaven and earth.  God (Alanis Morissette) would do
it, but she has assumed human form to play skee-ball and hasn't yet
returned to heaven.
Mr. Smith has assembled an impressive array of talent.  Alan Rickman
(JUDAS KISS) is acerbically funny as Metatron, the voice of God, who is as
anatomically challenged as a Ken doll.  Linda Fiorentino (THE LAST
SEDUCTION) is Bethany, a woman whose faith is wavering but because of her
ancestral roots, has been tapped to save existence.  Chris Rock (LETHAL
WEAPON IV) is Rufus, the 13th apostle, who claims to have been omitted
from the biblical records due to racist bigotry.  Jason Mewes (CLERKS) and
Kevin Smith (MALLRATS) return as the Jay and Silent Bob characters of
earlier Smith films, playing a pair of prophets for whom "religious sects"
conjures up a phonetic meaning.
DOGMA is ultimately disappointing because it wastes a grand opportunity
to make some valid points.  It is hard to take seriously a picture that
features a creature formed from the excrement of those crucified at
Golgotha.  But it is equally difficult to dismiss a film which obviously
operates from a perspective that God is real and all powerful and that
Jesus Christ is His son.  If one can wade through the toilet humor, sexual
references, and shocking imagery employed by Mr. Smith, one might find a
number of theological issues worthy of consideration buried beneath the
profanity and offensive material.
What we find is that Mr. Smith has not pointed his judgmental (and
scatological) finger at God but rather at how men have chosen to worship
God via the frameworks they have constructed for that purpose.  The
disappointment of which I speak comes partly from the uneven presentation
of this legitimate message.  For every profound and verifiable observation
made by Mr. Smith, we are subjected to a number of erroneous suppositions.
And of course, it is all camouflaged within a package of outrageous
behavior and offensive humor.
For instance, Rufus logically instructs Bethany on the existence of
Jesus' earthly siblings, refuting the Roman Catholic view of Mary as a
perpetual virgin.  Such a claim can be substantiated by scripture (Mark
6:3).  But later, Rufus makes the statement that belief systems as a whole
are faulty and we should instead rely on the free exchange of ideas.  That
is simply a lie.  While false doctrines exist and should be avoided, there
is a truth which can be believed wholeheartedly.  There just wasn't enough
of it represented in this film.

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
DIRECTED BY:      M. Night Shyamalan
STARRING:         Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia
Williams, Donnie Wahlberg
WRITTEN BY:       M. Night Shyamalan
RATED:            PG-13 for intense thematic material and violent images.
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       Genesis 2:16-17, 3:4, Ecclesiastes 9:5-6,10, 1
Thessalonians 4:13-18
It has happened again.  A movie that is well scripted, well acted, and
well directed.  It is involving, suspenseful... It even has an unexpected
twist at the end that packs a punch like a blow to the solar plexus.  But
in order to accept its premise one must also accept a spiritual lie.
THE SIXTH SENSE is that movie.  Starring Bruce Willis (ARMAGEDDON) as a
child psychologist and Haley Joel Osment (FORREST GUMP) as a troubled
youngster, THE SIXTH SENSE is more spooky than scary, though it does
contain disturbing images designed to startle.
Eight-year-old Cole Sear (Osment) sees dead people.  Not just in dreams.
And not just as lifeless bodies.  He sees them walking around like regular
people.  And he sees them all the time.
Dr. Malcolm Crowe (Willis) is trying to help him.  He recognizes in Cole
many of the same attributes as one of his earlier patients whom Crowe
failed, resulting in that patient shooting Crowe before turning the gun on
himself.  If Crowe could manage to find a way to help Cole, he believes he
just might be able to put his own demons to rest.
But first he needs to gain Cole's trust.  The boy is so frightened by
what he sees, he has closed himself off emotionally, being unwilling to
tell anyone... not Crowe, not even his own mother (Toni Collette,
CLOCKWATCHERS)... about his "secrets."  Crowe begins to spend more and
more time with him, even as his own marriage starts to dissolve around
him, his wife Anna (Olivia Williams, RUSHMORE) becoming cold and distant
because of his neglect of her and his preoccupation with the boy.
Bruce Willis underplays his role, allowing the excellent script to do
most of the work of building character development.  Crowe moves from
treating a troubled boy who won't communicate, to treating a troubled boy
who is having hallucinations, to wondering if perhaps there isn't some
truth behind what the boy sees.  Mr. Willis does a serviceable job,
letting the focus remain on the story instead of on his familiar action
hero screen persona.
Eleven-year-old Haley Joel Osment manages to impress us with his
performance.  He demonstrates an amazing amount of self-composure as well
as an ability to play nuances in a complex character as if he were a
seasoned pro.  It is fine work for one of such a tender age.  Keep your
eye on this young man.
The supporting cast is also quite effective.  Toni Collette, as the
confused, frightened, and frustrated mother who can't understand what is
happening to her child; Olivia Williams, as Crowe's once loving wife who
is shutting down emotionally due to the lack of attention from her
husband; and Donnie Wahlberg (RANSOM) as Crowe's ex-patient, now grown,
who illustrates his doctor's failure to help him in the most vivid terms
imaginable.
Twenty-eight year old M. Night Shyamalan (WIDE AWAKE) directed his own
script, maintaining a proper tension throughout the film and crafting the
storytelling so expertly that the film's full impact is not reached until
its final moments, when a surprising revelation forces a reevaluation of
all that preceded it.  It is a rare movie which manages to pull that off
and Mr. Shyamalan, as the one responsible, is certainly to be commended.
In giving THE SIXTH SENSE a favorable "three star" review for its
craftsmanship and artistic merit, I must also point out that, spiritually
speaking, the film is highly misleading.  There is no scriptural
foundation upon which to base a belief in ghosts or the "living dead."
The concept of death being a doorway to another plane of existence is a
devilish lie that has been around as long as man himself.  The first lie
recorded in the Bible was devised by the serpent who assured Eve, "Thou
shall not surely die," a direct contradiction of God's admonition.  That
same lie has been perpetuated ad infinitum throughout the ages.
Scriptures do speak of a time when the dead shall rise but that wonderful
demonstration of victory over death will not commence until after the
second coming of Christ... an event which has not yet occurred.
Therefore, the dead remain in a state of oblivion, having no
consciousness, until that long-awaited time when the final trump shall
sound.
And then, you'll need six senses to register all the joy and rejoicing
that will resound throughout the heavens.

Title
Review for Shiloh 2: Shiloh Season (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
Getting lost amid all the gross-out humor, sexual innuendo, and
potty-mouthed characters which fill our theaters and pass for modern day
entertainment, are the wholesome, family-oriented films the likes of
SHILOH 2.  This is a pity.  Families need and deserve films such as these
to help establish the qualities of morality, integrity, honesty, kindness,
and forgiveness that we'd like to think parents are teaching their
children.
Based on the award winning series of books by Phyllis Reynolds Naylor,
SHILOH 2 continues the telling of a simple story about a boy and his dog,
and the mean-spirited neighbor who threatens to come between them.
Whereas the first movie dealt with Marty's attempts to save Shiloh, a
precious, floppy-eared beagle, from his abusive owner, its sequel deals
with Marty's attempts to save Shiloh's former owner from himself.  Judd
Travers is an ill-tempered, antisocial man angered further by losing his
best hunting dog to Marty.  He is drinking heavily, driving erratically,
and generally terrorizing the surrounding community which gives him a wide
berth.
Marty begins to ask the question which becomes the dominant theme for the
film: "Can a person change?  If he is mean, is he mean forever?"
Writer Dale Rosenblum, who wrote the screenplay for the first SHILOH
movie, and director Sandy Tung (CONFESSIONS OF A SEXIST PIG) have brought
back most of the cast of the 1997 original film, including Michael
Moriarty as Ray Preston, Rod Steiger as kindly Doc Wallace, and Scott
Wilson as the ornery Judd Travers.
The younger cast members playing the roles of the Preston children have
been replaced.  Zachary Browne (TV's ER) takes over the role of Marty
Preston, the 12 year old owner of the most familiar beagle since Snoopy.
Most of the acting is adequate for the story, the standout exception
being Mr. Wilson's performance.  His realistic portrayal of the backwoods
curmudgeon gives the movie's message a depth of meaning that many other
moralistic films do not achieve.  Judd is not a stereotypical bad man.  He
is a bitter, unhappy, lonely soul who has never had a friend and has
little prospect of ever making one.
Some of the dialogue admittedly contains a few "groaners."  Marty, after
seeing Judd shoot a squirrel, indicating his lack of respect for the
hunting season, worriedly asks, "What if he makes it Shiloh season?"  The
movie also takes a while to get its legs under itself.  But once Marty
makes it his task to find out if Judd could ever stop being mean, the
story finds its pace and our interest.
Shiloh is no Lassie or Rin Tin Tin.  Those heroic dogs are often featured
as the most intelligent character appearing on their respective screens.
The dog in this film is less of a super-powered canine that saves the day
and more of a catalyst for the actions of the humans with whom he lives.
Thankfully, the filmmakers also refrained from churning out an
unrealistic fable where a bad man is miraculously made good overnight.
Judd initially rebukes Marty's intentions, and later ignores his further
attempts of friendship.  It is going to take a great deal of perseverance
and a gargantuan effort on Marty's part to break through Judd's crusty
shell and inspire a behavioral change.
It will be hard... But it is not impossible.  All of us are asked to
change on a daily basis.  We are to continually "put off" our "old man
nature" and renew ourselves according to the standard of righteousness.
"You were taught, with regard to your former way of life, to put off your
old self, which is being corrupted by its deceitful desires; be made new
in the attitude of your minds; to put on the new self." Ephesians 4:22-24a
[NIV]
As Marty learns, this is not something that happens overnight.  It takes
a great deal of commitment, perseverance, and an unwillingness to settle
for less.  It requires a daily decision to change bad or spiritually
unhealthy habits by adopting new and godly habits to take their place.
We could all use some of Marty's driving determination at times in order
to be successful.  Or perhaps we just need to have a love for someone
other than ourselves to motivate us to be better.

Title
Review for Double Jeopardy (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY: Bruce Beresford
STARRING: Ashley Judd, Tommy Lee Jones, Bruce Greenwood, Annabeth Gish
WRITTEN BY: David Weisberg, Douglas S. Cook
RATED: R for language, a scene of sexuality (nudity), and violence.
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES: Luke 21:12-15, James 1:5, Exodus 4:10-12
"No person (shall) be subject for the same offense to be twice put in
jeopardy of life or limb..." --  Fifth Amendment to the Constitution of
the United States.
A very liberal interpretation of that amendment serves as the basis for
the new Paramount feature, DOUBLE JEOPARDY.  Ashley Judd (SIMON BIRCH)
stars as Libby Parsons, a devoted mother whose life gets turned upside
down when her affluent husband is declared dead and she is charged, then
convicted, of his murder.
Her life takes another spin when, from behind bars, she discovers that
her young son and the woman to whom she entrusted his care have
disappeared.  When she finally tracks them down, she gets the biggest
surprise of all.  Her husband is apparently not dead, which means that not
only is she serving time for a crime she did not commit, she is serving
time for a crime that never took place.  The good news (if you want to
call it that) is that since she has been convicted and punished for
killing her husband, thanks to the Fifth Amendment she is now free to
really kill him without fear of legal consequence (or so we are led to
believe.)
Director Bruce Beresford (DRIVING MISS DAISY) breezes through these
premise setting introductory scenes as if he were power walking with the
wind at his back.  With the exposition so speedily dispatched, we can
settle in for the real meat of the movie which takes place six years later
as Libby attempts to find her son.   A task made more difficult due to the
relentless pursuit of her parole officer, Travis Lehman (Tommy Lee Jones,
VOLCANO).
  But Mr. Beresford has a problem.  Because more time wasn't spent in the
beginning to involve us in the lives of these people, we aren't all that
involved in the story of which they are part.  The end result is a series
of mildly entertaining chase scenes featuring characters we hardly know
played by actors who deserve better.
Ashley Judd has some good moments as a mother singly obsessed with
finding her child.  She makes some odd choices at the beginning of the
film, underplaying her wrongful arrest and conviction, but once she wins
her parole, her characterization gets some legs and she is off and running
(literally).
One of those chasing her is the reliable Tommy Lee Jones in a role that
is becoming all too familiar for him.  We've seen him before as the
pursuer in both THE FUGITIVE and US MARSHALS.  Here, as an ex-law
professor turned parole officer, he is more embittered and less sure of
himself, but the similarities to his other films cannot be mistaken.
Bruce Greenwood (THE SWEET HEREAFTER) is cast as the "now you bereave
him, now you don't" husband.  Appropriately insincere and full of oily
charm, Mr. Greenwood leaves no doubt as to who the bad guy is in this film.
The script by David Weisberg and Douglas S. Cook (THE ROCK) is
superficial at best. The actions scenes are taut and exciting, but there
is little else for which to commend it.
While in prison, Libby gets some advice (some of it laughable) on what to
say to the parole board that will be what they want to hear.  While that
may have worked to her advantage in this implausible script, as believers
we are commanded to handle things differently:
"But make up your mind not to worry beforehand how you will defend
yourselves.  For I will give you words and wisdom that none of your
adversaries will be able to resist or contradict."  Luke 21:14-15 [NIV]
Standing resolutely upon the truth, building the Word of God in your
mind, and staying peaceful and calm in your heart allows God to
communicate with the spirit within you thereby teaching you what to say or
do in times of need.  No finer defense could be given.  No better counsel
could be received.

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      David Fincher
STARRING:         Brad Pitt, Edward Norton, Helena Bonham Carter, Meat
Loaf, Jared Leto
WRITTEN BY:       Jim Uhls
RATED:            R for disturbing and graphic depiction of violent
anti-social behavior, sexuality and language.
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       James 4:1-3, Ephesians 6:12, Proverbs 4:14-19
Just two weeks ago, I reviewed a movie in which sixteen different kinds
of devil spirits could be identified as influencing the actions of the on
screen characters.  Of course, there are more than just those sixteen
classifications.  Now I understand why the one film only used the sixteen.
The others were needed on the set of FIGHT CLUB, a disturbing and twisted
cinematic roller coaster of a ride.
David Fincher (SEVEN) does not flinch or shy away from depicting a
nihilistic view of society.  Instead he embraces the challenge of making
two self-destructive characters his likable leads.  He paints the bleak
and darkly comedic picture with the skill and adeptness of a genuine
auteur.  The film is original, inventive, and spiritually nauseating all
at the same time.
Edward Norton (AMERICAN HISTORY X) narrates the film for us as Jack, an
insomniac so disillusioned and disenfranchised with life that he regularly
visits different support groups in order to experience some kind of
cathartic release which enables him to sleep.  Testicular Cancer,
Alcoholics Anonymous, Brain Tumors R Us... it doesn't matter, although it
would appear that the more painful the affliction, the greater the
emotional release.  Ergo, the sweeter the sleep.
His need for this perverse charade is eliminated once he meets Tyler
Durden (Brad Pitt, MEET JOE BLACK).  In hindsight, his continuing the
pretense of having testicular cancer would have been a lot saner than
following the direction of this charasmatic, unconventional, soap
salesman.   Together, Tyler and Jack discover the therapuetic benefits of
beating the living daylights out of another human being (or conversely,
being knocked senseless by another person).
Dubbing their new organization "Fight Club," they begin attracting other
followers who, like them, want to fight another person in order to feel
the adrenaline rush through their bodies, even as their blood is pouring
out.  Only then do they truly feel "alive."
This perverse type of logic runs throughout the film.  More and more
"members" are recruited, joining what has become a "don't ask, don't tell,
don't think" army.  Having two men pummel one another is no longer
sufficient for Tyler's demented psyche, so plans for "Operation Mayhem"
are put into action.  Fight Club takes on the shape of an underground
terrorist organization with their aggression turning outward, targeting
the societal ills Tyler deems "responsible" for the desperate plight of
mankind.
Jack watches the evolution of the Fight Club he helped to found, feeling
a bit left out as the club takes on a life of its own, moving inexorably
to an end he cannot control.
The acting is superb, both Mr. Pitt and Mr. Norton demonstrating their
consummate talents in difficult and complex roles.  Helena Bonham Carter
(THE THEORY OF FLIGHT) is very much their acting equal as a tough but
troubled girl who inserts herself into Jack's life and home, first by
invading his support groups and later by engaging in a violently sexual
relationship with Tyler.  Meat Loaf (CRAZY IN ALABAMA) and Jared Leto
(URBAN LEGEND) also provide strong support as two very different Fight
Club members.
As artistically fascinating as the movie may be, the spiritual sickness
that it depicts is, at the very least, distasteful.  While I have given
the movie high praise for its artistic elements and director's vision, the
lack of a star rating indicates my strongest caution.  This is a movie
that depicts characters with no spiritual insight and therefore no defense
against devilish logic, influence or possession.  The "glitzy" style and
the boisterous performances may make it palatable for today's audiences,
but when stripped down to its ugly essence, the negative anti-social
messages at its core give nihilists worldwide something for which to cheer.
At one point, the no-named, dehumanized members of Tyler's army learn
that upon dying, one becomes "human" and finally worthy of being called by
a proper name.  This sick message is something the author of death would
dearly love to promote.

Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
Wars simply don't make godly sense. Hype and political propaganda aside,
the Persian Gulf war was no exception.  THREE KINGS, in using Operation
Desert Storm as its setting, pulls no punches when depicting the
confusion, political duplicity, and moral dilemmas engendered by that
conflict.
Writer/director David O. Russell (FLIRTING WITH DISASTER) researched
heavily before embarking upon this project and his preliminary efforts
have paid off handsomely.  He has crafted the most irreverent war story
since M*A*S*H hit the silver screen in the 1970's.  The opening scene also
had definite traces of CATCH-22 influence.
Archie Gates (George Clooney, OUT OF SIGHT) is a Special Forces captain
who has been relegated to the sidelines during this high tech,
computerized engagement.  His current assignment involves nothing more
than baby-sitting the media faces who are swarming the area looking for
stories, all of which have long been done and overdone.
With the discovery of a map secreted in a captured Iraqi soldier's anal
cavity, (said hiding place serving as the butt for many a joke), Archie
gives himself a new "assignment."   The map indicates the position of
Iraqi bunkers where it is rumored Sadaam Hussein has hidden an obscene
amount of gold bullion stolen from Kuwait.
With the war now over, Archie and a small band of American GI's decide to
liberate the gold from Sadaam's forces.  Of course, their intentions are
purely self-serving.  But as they travel deeper into Iraq to collect their
spoils of war, they begin to witness firsthand what American policy has
done for and to the people of Iraq.
The film slowly takes a serious turn, pointing an accusative finger at
the Bush Administration which was allegedly responsible for the lies and
false hopes that were fed to the Iraqi people.  Encouraged to rise up
against Sadaam Hussein with promised support from the American government,
the Iraqi people were left "twisting in the wind" as Sadaam's army
brutally put down the internal rebellion with no interference from the US
forces who stood idly by.  Seeing this, Archie and the others are forced
to question their own principles and character.
Mr. Russell continues to shift the story from seriously comic to
comically serious, the emphasis changing as frequently as the political
winds of favor.
Mr. Clooney again displays the sardonic humor we've seen from him in the
past.  His Archie is a grizzled combat veteran who doesn't have the
faintest idea why he is in the midst of a barren and desolate desert with
a bunch of know-nothing volunteer reservists, but as long as he is, he
figures he might as well profit from the experience.
Mark Wahlberg (BOOGIE NIGHTS) is surprisingly effective as Sgt. Troy
Barlow, new father and genuinely decent guy.  In perhaps the most riveting
sequence, Troy is tortuously interrogated by an Iraqi soldier.  During the
experience they learn how closely their lives parallel.
The film has a distinctive stylized look about it.  Alternating between a
realistic look, a bleached-out, "shaky-cam" documentary look, and a
jazzed-up, special FX look, the visual style of THREE KINGS is just
disconcerting enough to keep us on edge.
The film does include some scenes of which the easily squeamish should be
aware.  After all, this is a war setting.  In war, bullets are fired.
This movie, more than most, shows in graphic detail the devastating damage
a bullet can do to a human body.
The salient point of the movie is that even in the midst of a devilish,
hellish environment, it is available to maintain one's morality and
compassion.  As individuals, we always have a choice.  As believers, our
view of right or wrong is based upon a standard that is unmovable.  As we
commit ourselves to the upholding of that standard, our actions and
decisions will reflect the goodness of the One Who created it.
Archie claims that the most important thing in life is necessity.  That
is only true if we define "need" properly.  The greatest need that any of
us have is a knowledge of truth.  Armed with a knowledge of truth and the
conviction to act upon that truth, our decisions become sound and our
lives have impact and meaning.

Title
Review for For Love of the Game (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Sam Raimi
STARRING:         Kevin Costner, Kelly Preston, John C. Reilly, Jena Malone
WRITTEN BY:       Dana Stevens
RATED:            PG-13 for brief strong language and some sexuality
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       James 1:8, Luke 12:29-31, Isaiah 26:3
They call it "batting a thousand."  For the third time, Kevin Costner
(THE POSTMAN) turns to the game of baseball for the setting within which
to tell a multilayered story and for the third time, connects for a hit.
In BULL DURHAM, he played an aging minor league catcher tapped to hone a
promising young talent for the majors.  In so doing, he taught Susan
Sarandon a little about love.  In FIELD OF DREAMS, he played an aging
baseball fan, who listening to voices, built a baseball diamond in his
cornfield.  In so doing, he taught James Earl Jones a little about hope
and believing.
In FOR LOVE OF THE GAME, Mr. Costner takes on the role of an aging
pitcher playing in what could quite possibly turn out to be his final
game.  During his illustrious 19 year career Billy Chapel has been the
mainstay of the Detroit Tigers organization.  Just prior to the final game
of a somewhat dismal season, he finds out that his girlfriend of five
years is leaving him and that his team has been sold to parties who may
wish to trade him.
As he takes the mound against the Yankees in what should be a meaningless
game, the thoughts that run through his mind are played out on the screen
for us to view.  Alternating between what's happening in the game and what
has happened in his past, For Love Of The Game tells the story of an
"old-school" ballplayer reflecting on his life in and out of the sport.
As the movie progresses, we, along with Billy, begin to realize that this
game is taking on an import that reaches beyond statistics or the
scoreboard.
Based on the novel by Michael Shaara, director Sam Raimi (A SIMPLE PLAN)
and screenwriter Dana Stevens (CITY OF ANGELS) present a film which is
surprisingly paced much like the game itself.  It is slow at times but
always moving, with just enough "highlight reel" moments to make things
interesting.
Kevin Costner adds another "Aw shucks" adult boy scout characterization
to his resume with his portrayal of Billy Chapel.  But there is something
about this "too good to be true" ballplayer that will immediately appeal
to the baseball purist.  Throughout everything else in his life --
mistakes he has made or regrets he may carry -- the one constant is his
"love of the game" of baseball.  The business surrounding the game may
have changed over the years, but his love for it hasn't, nor has the rules
by which he plays.
Kelly Preston (HOLY MAN) plays Jane Aubrey, the woman who tries to have a
relationship with a man whose first love involves eight other men.  Miss
Preston is quite touching in her performance as a woman, scarred by the
past and scared of the future.  She is sure that she loves Billy but she
is uncertain if he will ever love her enough.  Her confusion regarding the
unusual "love triangle" in which she finds herself is genuine and
heartfelt.
John C. Reilly (NEVER BEEN KISSED) is Gus, the compassionate catcher and
sounding board for Billy.  Jena Malone (STEPMOM) completes the cast of
central characters as Heather, the troubled teen aged daughter of Jane.
There is a reason baseball is known as "America's Pastime."  The game
reaches us on a level few other sports can, evoking memories and emotions
that will never be forgotten.  At its purest level, baseball is a
wholesome, family-oriented game that can both entertain and inspire.
The game is also rife with spiritual or biblical lessons and analogies
and has long been used as subject matter for sermons and teachings in many
biblically based ministries.
To point to just one example: throughout the game, Billy demonstrates an
uncanny ability to block out the distractions of the ballpark in order to
focus completely on his task at hand...pitching to whichever batter is
opposing him.  He calls it "clearing the mechanism."  God calls it
singleness of mind and it is just one key to success that the Bible
teaches us.  There are more... many more... that we may study and apply to
live a life more than abundant.
Three is a number which biblically signifies completeness of a unit.
With FOR LOVE OF THE GAME as the third installment to his baseball movie
trilogy,  Mr. Costner completes a wonderful tribute to a wonderful game.

Title
Review for Dick (1999)
DIRECTED BY:       Andrew Fleming
STARRING:              Kirsten Dunst, Michelle Williams, Dan Hedaya, Dave
Foley, Will Ferrell, Bruce McCulloch, Saul Rubinek
WRITTEN BY:          Andrew Fleming, Sheryl Longin
RATED:                    PG-13 for sex-related humor, drug content, and
language.
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:      Proverbs 20:17, Psalms 101:7, Proverbs 19:5
I hate to admit it, but the blistering satire DICK made more sense to me
in explaining the ins and outs of the Watergate scandal than any news
reporter or political analyst of the day ever did.  Sure it's revisionist
history... but at least it tied up every loose end and answered every
question.  Besides, it was a lot more fun to sit through than the real
thing.
According to DICK, it all begins when 15 year olds Betsy Jobs (Kirsten
Dunst, DROP DEAD GORGEOUS) and Arlene Lorenzo (Michelle Williams, DAWSON'S
CREEK) leave the Watergate hotel where they are staying in order to mail a
love letter to teen idol Bobby Sherman.  Their actions, when sneaking out
of the complex, prompt a guard's call to the police who then stumble upon
the Watergate burglars.
Later, during a high school field trip tour through the White House, they
meet up with G. Gordon Liddy (Harry Shearer, SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE), Bob
Haldeman (Dave Foley, KIDS IN THE HALL), Henry Kissinger (Saul Rubinek,
BAD MANNERS), and John Dean (Jim Breuer, SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE).  Being teen
aged girls, they of course lavish all their attention upon Checkers the
dog.
While all the president's men try to decide how to handle these two
bubble-brained adolescents, President Nixon ("Call me Dick") takes matters
into his own hands because, to use his own oily words, "I have a way with
young people.  They trust me."  He christens them official "White House
dog walkers" and "secret youth advisors."
Thus begins an irreverent romp through modern history as Betsy and Arlene
are credited with being inadvertently responsible for: the end of the
Vietnam War; a new peace initiative between the US and the USSR; Nixon's
signature "V" pose; erasing eighteen and one-half minutes of presidential
tape and; giving the bickering Washington Post reporters Woodward and
Bernstein the biggest story of their careers.
Director Andrew Fleming (THE CRAFT) and newcomer Sheryl Longin
co-scripted DICK and were so faithful to their initial premise and so
inventive in carrying it out, that there is an unexpected plausibility to
the outrageous scenarios being depicted.
It helps that both Miss Dunst and Miss Williams are priceless, being
delightfully giddy and appropriately pubescent in their characterizations.
Miss Williams is especially amusing as her Arlene fantasizes about
President Nixon to the point that he replaces Bobby Sherman as her
teen-dream poster boy.
  The girls manage to play the naiveté of their on-screen roles with a
sweet genuineness and believability that serves to enhance their
crestfallen disappointment and teen-aged ire once they realize that their
Dick is "a bad man!"
The confrontation between these two teenyboppers and their President
after they hear his private tapes (before the expletives were deleted) is
not only a hoot, it is somehow oddly rewarding.  How many of us wished we
could have said these words to President Nixon's face:  "You've got a
potty-mouth!"
In a brilliant piece of casting, Dan Hedaya was tapped to play the
"Tricky Dick" caricature of Nixon and he does himself proud.   His Dick
Nixon is shifty, incapable of sincerity, and deserves to go down.
Trust is something that once lost, is almost impossible to regain.  All
comedy aside, the two female leads had no reason to distrust their
president until he gave them cause.
A lie is never excusable.  No matter how tempting it might be to offer a
lie to avoid a punishment, a lie will always lead to a worse consequence.
"Bread of deceit is sweet to a man; but afterwards his mouth shall be
filled with gravel."  Proverbs 20:17 [KJV]
We can only hope that this is a lesson that, sooner or later, our
presidents will be sure to learn.

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Frank Darabont
STARRING:         Tom Hanks, David Morse, Michael Clarke Duncan, James
Cromwell, Michael Jeter, Doug Hutchison
WRITTEN BY:       Frank Darabont
RATED:            R for violence, language, and some sex-related material
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       1 Corinthians 12:7-11, Mark 10:51-52, Matthew 15:25-28
"Sometimes the 'green mile' seems sooooo long."  Indeed.  And any
filmmaker with a three hour movie who ends it with that gem of dialogue
should expect to see it quoted in a review.  On a more positive note, let
me add that sometimes THE GREEN MILE is almost good enough to make us
forget its length.
The mile in question (green due to its faded lime-colored linoleum) leads
from the prison cell to "Old Sparky," the electric chair where executions
were carried out at Louisiana's Cold Mountain Penitentiary in 1935.  Paul
Edgecomb (Tom Hanks, YOU'VE GOT MAIL) is the head guard of E-block,
otherwise known as death row.  Keeping his prisoners calm as they await
the carrying out of their sentence is his primary responsibility.  It is a
responsibility which he capably delegates to the other guards on his watch
by insisting they "talk to" the convicts instead of yelling at them.  This
practice leads to an unusual camaraderie between the guards and the men
behind their bars.
Into his charge comes one John Coffey (Michael Clarke Duncan,
ARMAGEDDON), a seven foot tall gentle giant who has been convicted of the
rape and murder of two young girls.  Immediately, Paul senses something
different about this prisoner.  Perhaps its the way he asked for a night
light because he is frightened of the dark.  Or perhaps it is the mystical
healing powers he demonstrates as he "takes back" Paul's bladder infection
thereby restoring him to health.
  Based on Steven King's 1996 serialized novel, THE GREEN MILE does offer
other characters who have stories to be told:  Eduard Delacroix (Michael
Jeter, PATCH ADAMS), is a frail Cajun convict who befriends and trains a
mouse to do circus tricks; Percy Wetmore (Doug Hutchison, A TIME TO KILL),
is a young and sadistic guard sitting on a transfer to a more lucrative
position because he has yet to see a prisoner "fry" up close; and Hal
Moores (James Cromwell, BABE: PIG IN THE CITY) is the compassionate warden
for whom, despite all the executions he's witnessed, death never loomed as
large as when his own wife was diagnosed with a tumor.
While it is Mr. Hanks "everyman" performance at the center of the film
which gives it the anchor to hold our interest for 180 minutes, it is the
performances of his supporting cast that are most worth noting.  All
involved do credible work in their respective roles, most especially Mr.
Duncan, who turns in an impressive, fully realized characterization.
If only the story were more credible.  Writer/director Frank Darabont
(THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION) has crafted a flawed fantasy/allegory of sorts;
one which is more spiritualistic than spiritual, relying on a
preternatural mysticism rather than a genuine and godly spiritual power.
Mr. Darabont also overplays his hand considerably in the manipulation of
our affection towards and association with his characters.  Was it an
accidental omission that the first two inmates who walked the green mile
were being punished for crimes never disclosed?  By not knowing the reason
for the condemned convicts' presence on E-block, the audience never gets
the sense of the justice which is being carried out, making the death
penalty appear cruel and unwarranted.  This is especially true during the
gruesome depiction of the second execution which was horribly botched.
Much has also been made of Coffey's Christ-like ability to heal but
unlike the numerous healings which are recorded in the scriptures,
Coffey's powers are shrouded in mystery, taking on the feel of a circus
trick, coupled with a voodoo-like "I feel your pain" transference.
In contrast, there is no mystery associated with the healing that is from
God.  The genuine "gifts of healing" listed in 1 Corinthians 12 is just
one of the nine manifestations of holy spirit and can be operated by any
spiritually instructed man or woman in accordance with the knowledge and
wisdom of God.
True spiritual healing (with few exceptions) requires the committed
believing of both the healer as well as the one being healed.  Such
believing comes not from the shrouded secrets of mysticism, but from the
revealed Word of God.

Title
Review for Mickey Blue Eyes (1999)
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Kelly Makin
STARRING:         Hugh Grant, Jeanne Tripplehorn, James Caan, Burt Young,
James Fox, Joe Viterelli
WRITTEN BY:       Adam Scheinman, Robert Kuhn
RATED:            PG-13 for brief strong language, some violence, and
sensuality
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       1 Corinthians 15:33, Proverbs 27:17, Proverbs 1:10-16
I don't know if I would say that Hugh Grant (NOTTING HILL) is a great
actor, but there is no doubt that he's a great personality.  For the
second time this summer, Mr. Grant goes to the romantic comedy well and,
once again, completely wins us over with his charm and self-effacing
humor.  He doesn't show us anything new, but when the familiar works so
well, what does it matter?
In MICKEY BLUE EYES, Hugh Grant is Michael Felgate, the manager of an art
auction house, who is head over heels in love with Gina Vitale (Jeanne
Tripplehorn, SLIDING DOORS).  But soon after Michael "pops the question"
(in an extremely funny scene set in Chinese restaurant), he learns that
Gina's father, Frank (James Caan, THE GODFATHER) is involved in the family
business... a family whose members are named after types of food
preparation (as in Vinnie the Butcher.)
Even though he gives his assurance to Gina that he will never be drawn
into her family's world of crime and corruption, he did not anticipate
that their world might come to him.  He quickly finds himself
unintentionally entangled in mob business.   When an accident results in
the death of the son of mob boss Uncle Vito (Burt Young, ROCKY), Michael
tries, with the help of his future father-in-law, to not only extract
himself from future dealings, but also to avoid being "whacked" himself.
As with ANALYZE THIS (now out in video), much of the humor of MICKEY BLUE
EYES comes from the incongruity of a "normal," decent man trying to fit in
with the caricatured personas of mobsters, racketeers, and hit men.  Add
Mr. Grant's cultured English accent contrasted against the
Italian-American Brooklynese of Gina's family and this fish-out-of-water
story becomes a whale of a comedy.
In what might arguably be considered the funniest moment in the film,
Frank coaches Michael on how to sound like a gangster, as he has to try to
pass himself off as "Mickey Blue Eyes" from Kansas City.  The result is an
hilarious accent that is completely unidentifiable.
As he was with NOTTING HILL, Mr. Grant is ably supported by a talented
cast.  James Caan gives a very strong and amusing performance as a man
torn between his love for his daughter and his loyalty to Vito and the
mob.  Jeanne Tripplehorn is lovely as Michael's intended Mafia princess.
Burt Young is appropriately "godfatherish" in a comically understated way.
Joe Viterelli (ANALYZE THIS) adds yet another Mafioso role to his resume,
which by this time must resemble a 'Who's Who List of Wise Guys."
The film was produced through Simian Films, the company founded by Mr.
Grant and Elizabeth Hurley (AUSTIN POWERS).  It was directed by Kelly
Makin (BRAIN CANDY: KIDS IN THE HALL)
Hugh Grant's character finds himself immersed in a untenable position
because he failed to heed the Gina's advice.  She had predicted what would
happen:  "A little favor, a tiny lie, and you're theirs."
Her point was valid, and a cautionary tale for us.  Her concern was that
once "the family" did a small favor for Michael, or if he accepted a small
token from them, an unspoken obligation would then exist.  A debt that
could never be repaid leading to an offer that could not be refused.
This is why we should always be extremely careful with whom we associate
and to whom we become "indebted."  As the scriptures say:
"Do not be misled: Bad company corrupts good character." 1 Corinthians
15:33 [NIV]
God never tells us to tolerate evil or coexist with it.  We are told to
avoid, eschew, and resist it.  In contrast, we are told to seek out and
fellowship with those spiritually strong in heart and mind so we may
benefit from their strength.
For any actor who wishes to grow stronger in his ability to properly make
a romantic comedy...he merely needs to seek out and learn from a guy by
the name of Hugh Grant.
